Story:

Noch bevor ich zu Jack Morgan wurde und bevor P.O. & Friends entstand, hatte ich ein anderes Leben, wie jeder normale Mensch auch.
Ich wuchs als zweites Kind meiner Eltern, die beide Pädagogen waren, auf. Meine Schwester, die zwei Jahre älter ist als ich, wuchs ich wohlbehütet auf. Allerdings war ich auch ein Rebell, aber dazu später.
Als ich zur Schule ging, hatte ichs nicht leicht. Da mein Vater stellvertretender Direktor der Schule war, wurde ich immer gemobbt, verprügelt, getreten, bespuckt.
Irgendwann, als ich etwas älter wurde, lies ich mir nicht mehr, aus Angst verletzt zu werden, alles gefallen und fing ich an mich zu wehren. Dabei hatte ich einem Jungen, der mich angriff, die Nase gebrochen. Das hatte auf Grund dessen, dass mein Vater stellvertretender Direks war, keinerlei Konsequenzen in der Schule, aber privat zu Hause…
Stubenarrest, Hausarbeiten, Schulübungen und so weiter. Aber Egal. Heute habe ich daraus gelernt. Und es hat mich nicht dümmer gemacht. Ich war ganz gut in der Schule, vor allem hat mich Musik und Sport begeistert. Ich sauge heute immer noch gute Musik in mich auf. Aber die ehrliche Musik stammt aus den 80ern. Ganz klar und ganz ungeschönt. Weil….. Sie war die letzte handgemachte Musik, bevor Synth und Computer die Rolle der Musiker übernommen haben. Die Musik, die ich liebe, muss harmonisch sein.. viele verschiedene Klangfarben in sich tragen und miteinander verschmelzen. 
Da meine Mutter Kindergärtnerin war, hat sie immer darauf geachtet, das meine Haare ordentlich gekämmt und geschnitten waren (ich habe das gehaßt, ich wollte meinen eigenen Styl) Sie hat immer darauf geachtet, dass ich immer und überall pünktlich war, dass ich saubere Klamotten anhatte. Und weil wir nicht sehr reich waren, musste ich immer Klamotten von meiner Schwester anziehen, aus denen sie herausgewachsen war. Mädchenklamotten.... das ging ja mal gar nicht. Aber, ich musste mich unterordnen. Ich war ja noch Kind. Zwar mit eigenem Kopf, aber der wurde mir gehörig gewaschen wenn ich protestierte. Ich musste immer pünktlich zu Hause sein. immer 18:00 Uhr. Andere Kinder spielten noch draußén. Ich musste nach Hause. Das hat mich ausgegrenzt. Wenn ich Freunde mit nach Hause brachte, wollten meine Eltern immer wissen, wer das ist, wer die Eltern sind, wor der oder die wohnen. Und dieser Kontrollzwang führte dazu, dass irgendwann niemand mehr zu mir kam. Ich musste immer zu meinen Freunden nach Hause oder wir trafen uns irgendwo draußen. Das hat mich schon generft und es hat mich weiter ausgegrenzt. . Lücke 2 . Mein Vater war Lehrer in einer Realschule und stellvertretender Direktor. Schon aus diesem Grund allein hat mich kaum jemand besucht. Mein Vater war während dieser Zeit ein Grummel, ein verbitterter Mann und Vater. Er setzte mir die strengsten Regeln meiner Eltern auf. Nähmlich sofort nach der Schule nach Hause zu kommen und Hausaufgaben zu machen. Ohne erledigte Hausaufgaben durfte ich das Haus nicht verlassen. Manchmal waren aber meine Hausaufgaben so schwer (jedenfalls für mich) dass ich manchmal bis spät Abends daran gesessen habe. Mein Vater hat mich und meine Ergebnisse (Er war Mathelehrer) immer wieder, kontrolliert und immer erst kurz vor der totalen Verzweiflung hat er mir geholfen. Mein Vater war wirklich sehr streng mit mir. Nicht mit meiner Schwester. Sie war immer fleißig und hat alles viel schneller begriffen als ich. Ich hingegen habe schon beim kleinen einmaleins versagt. Rechtschreibung und Gramathik waren mir ein Graus. Meine HausAufsätze, die ich für die Schule schreiben musste, waren abnomal schlecht und am Ende des Abends, hat mir immer meine Mutter geholfen die Aufsätze zu schreiben. Mein Vater wäre nie auf die Idee gekommen mir dabei zu helfen. Ich hatte eig. immer das Gefühl, von meinem Vater gehaßt zu werden. Wir hatten deshalb nie so ein vertrauensvolles Verhältnis, wie ich zu meiner Mutter hatte. Von ihr habe ich mich immer geliebt gefühlt. Genau das Gegenteil von dem Gefühl meines Vaters zu mir. Ich denke heute immer, er wollte kein zweites Kind. . Lücke 3 ........ folgt.... //kein dazwischenschreiben deinerseits//
Lücke 3 . Weil halt meine Schwester (in meinen Augen) das lieblingskind war, fühlte ich mich sogar von meinen Elter (jedenfalls von meinem ´Vater) ausgegrenzt. Alles in Allem, war ich ein ausgegrenztes Kind. Meine Schwester hingegen, brachte schulische Bestleistungen nach Hause, sie hat sich geärgert, wenn sie mal ne 3 bekommen hat, oder wenn sie ne Hausaufgabe nicht allein bewältigen konnte. Aber ihr wurde anders geholfen als mir. Freundlicher, liebevoller. Wenn ich meinen Vater mal nach Hilfe gefragt habe, kam immer von ihm "dann gucks dir noch mal genau an, dann kommste schon drauf" So oder so ungefähr. Der Wotlaut spielt auch keine Rolle, sondern der Ton macht die Musik. Und es war keine Musik, die mir gefallen hat. Und weil mir die Musik, also der Umgangston, meines Vaters nicht gefallen hat, habe ich mich automatisch von ihm disanziert. Ich habe mich zwar gefreut, wenn er mal mit mir Federball gespielt hat, oder mit mir Fußball oder Tischtennis auf dem Hof, aber ich hab bei ihm nie gemerkt, dass er es aus Liebe zu seinem Sohn tat. Bei meiner Mutter war das genau das Gegenteil. Bei ihr habe ich mich geborgen und mich geliebt gefühlt. Also habe ich all diese Dinge, die ein Vater mit seinem Sohn machen sollte, mit meiner Mutter, oder mit meiner Schwester getan. Federball, Tischtennis, Fußball. Ich habe also mehr Freizeit mit meiner Mutter oder meiner Schwester verbracht, als mit meinem Vater oder mit Schulkameraden und Freunden. . Lücke 4 . klar gabs Regelbrüche... hehe... Ich kam nicht immer sofort nach der Schule nach Hause, sondern bin bei und mit Freunden unterwegs gewesen. Mein Bester Freund hat genau neben der Schule gewohnt und mit seinen Eltern habe ich mich zehnmal besser verstanden als mit meinen eigenen. Und, die haben mich verstanden und so akzeptiert wie ich war. Nicht immer habe ich meine Hausaufgaben gemacht. Ich habe einfach keine eingeschrieben, also hatte ich für meine Eltern keine Hausaufgaben auf. Erledigt.... hehe. Aber es gab halt auch schlechte Noten, wo die Unterschfit der Eltern drauf musste.. Oh warte.... Ich hab mich manchmal nicht getraut eine Note 5 zu Hause zu zeigen. Also bin ich auf die verrückte Idee gekommen, mir jemanden zu suchen, der die Unterschrift meiner Mutter perfekt fälschen konnte. Meine beste Freundin war genau diese Person. Sie hat immer meine schlechten Noten unterschrieben, als meine Mutter. Aber irgendwann is da aufgeflogen und da gabs richtig Ärger. Ich hab meine Freundin nie verraten. Ich hab gesagt, das ichs selber war um sie zu schützen. Ich war mit Freunden Unterwegs, die meinen Eltern gar nicht gepasst haben. Entweder, weil sie schlecht in der Schule waren und das ja mein Vater wußte, oder weil sie sozial aufällig waren. Manche meiner Freunde haben sich geprügelt, manche haben im Einkaufszentrum geklaut und so weiter, aber DIE haben mich verstanden. Die haben mich akzeptier wie ich war und ich wollte immer dazu gehören. Also habe ich heimlich viel zeit mit verbotenen Freunden, an verbotenen Orten verbracht. Heimlich geraucht und Alkohol getrunken. Niemand zu Hause durfte davon was merken. Ich konnte es auch immer gut verheimlichen. Nach der Schule bin ich zu einem Freund gegangen, dessen Eltern beide geraucht haben. Der hat immer Zigaretten gehabt, also habe ich dort meine Erste Zigarette geraucht. Man, ich sag dir, war mir danach schlecht. Aber.... das hat mich nicht davon abgehalten immer und immer wieder zu rauchen. Ich war damals glaube so um die 12 oder 13. Ich habe viele verbotenen (aus der Sicht meiner Eltern) getan. Und ich bin da heute stolz drauf, dass ich es getan habe. Stolz darauf, dass ich rebellisch war. Und das ich nicht der brave Sohn war, den mein Vater gewiss gerne gehabt hätte. Nö, ich wollte nie so ein glattgebügelter, faltenfreier, Mensch ohne Fehler, werden wie ich es hätte sein sollen. Ich ging, wenn mein Vater am Wochenende Abends zum Skat in der Kneipe war, oder meine Eltern sich mit anderen Eltern oder ihren Freunden getroffen haben, zur Disco. Dort war ich für ein paar Minuten frei, unter gleichgesinnten, unter Freunden, mit Musik, die mir gefiel. Nicht alles, es war ja damals verboten ausschließlich westdeutsche, oder überhaupt westliche Musik zu hören. Das Verhältnis ostmusik zu westmusik, musste glaube immer 60/40, oder gar 70/30 sein. Irgendwann hing dir Ostmusik einfach nur zum Halse raus. Also hab ich mich auf jeden westTitel gestürzt und in mich eingesaugt. Westmusik war einfach ehrlicher, spürbar freier und zwangloser als die zensierten OstSongs. Und weil ich diese Musik geliebt habe, lief die auch bei uns zu Hause, aber die musste heimlich laufen. Wehe mein Vater hätte das mitbekommen. Oder Westfernsehen... das ging gar nicht.. Das hat falsche Einflüsse auf mich gehabt. Aber ich hab schon früh als Kind, bzw. jugendlicher, gemerkt, dass wir in der DDR nicht frei waren. Nicht frei in unserem handeln und nicht frei in unserem Denken. Also habe ich mir meine eigenen Gedanken zum DDR Staat gemacht, die natürlich so gar nicht konform mit denen meines Vaters waren. Also hab ich meine Gedanken für mich behalten. in der DDR gabs mal einen Song .... "Die Geanken sind frei, wer kann sie erraten?".... hehe, wie wir heute wissen... NIX war frei. //Gott sei Dank ist die Mauer gefallen... Aber auch heute und hier sind wir mit unseren Gedanken nicht frei. Aber das weißt du sicher selber.// .
In der 10. Klasse, wurde ich in die Leichtathletik Mannschaft geworben. Ich zeigte gute bis sehr gute Leistungen im Sportunterricht. Meine Stärken waren Langläufe, Hoch- und Weitsprung. Ich habe mich da richtig verausgabt. Ich denke es war eine Art Aggressionsbewältigung. Obwohl ich nie wirklich aggressiv war. Luftablassen trifft es vlt. eher.
Eines Tages fuhren wir zu Wettkämpfen und da sah ich sie zum ersten Mal. Meine erste wirklich wahre und große Liebe. Aber leider war sie erst 12. Ich war fast 16, wir waren also 3,5 Jahre auseinander.
Meine Eltern waren strikt gegen diese Beziehung, eben weil SIE erst 12 war. (Diese Story kennst du, wir haben ein Konzeptalbum darüber gemacht „Romeo & Juliet“)
Wir liebten uns wirklich abgöttisch, aber nach ca. einem halben Jahr, war Schluss, nachdem ich sie 3 Tage nicht sehen konnte, weil wir auf Klassenfahrt waren, hat sie sich mit einem anderen Jungen aus ihrer Klasse getröstet… Als ichs erfahren habe, war das genau an dem Tag als John Lennon ermordet wurde. Der 08.12.1980. Unvergessen John und unvergessen unsere Liebe, die genau an diesem selben Tag endete. Es hat mir das Herz zerissen. Im wahrsten Sinne des Wortes. In diesem Moment, von irgendjemandem ein falsches Wort und ich wäre explodiert. Ich litt sehr lange an dieser Trennung, nur habe ich es nie jemanden spüren lassen. Ich war immer ein Mensch, der alles in sich hineinfraß. Vlt. mache ich auch gerade deshalb dieses neue Projekt, um mal Luft abzulassen.

Als ich nach der Schule in die Ausbildung ging, waren dort andere Mädchen und mit denen verstand ich mich immer sehr gut. Irgendwann hat sich aus einer dieser Freundschaften auch wieder eine echte Liebe entwickelt. Aber das Gefühl von damals hat es nicht erreicht. Es war nicht das gleiche. Es fühlte sich nicht so intensiv an wie damals. Die erste große Liebe ist schon was ganz besonderes.. Einzigartig und unvergessen. Ich denke dass es jedem Menschen so geht… Dass sich jeder Mensch auf dieser Welt, immer an seine erste große Liebe erinnert, egal wie lange es her ist. Aber auch diese Beziehung hielt nicht lange und wir trennten uns wieder, aber wir konnten uns danach immer noch in die Augen schauen. Nach meiner Ausbildung zum Maschinen- und Anlagenmonteur wurde ich am 01.11.1983 zur Armee einberufen. Ich hatte mich freiwillig für 10 Jahre, als Berufsunteroffizier, gemeldet und auch prompt, als ich 18 Jahre alt war, wieder frisch verliebt in ein Mädchen, zur Armee gerufen. Wieder eine „vorübergehende“ Trennung, Trennungsschmerz und Tränen. Nicht nur über ihr Gesicht.
Ein halbes Jahr Grundausbildung zum Spezialnachrichtendienstler (Chiffreur -  Dechiffreur) war nicht sehr leicht für mich, weil sich meine damalige Freundin wieder von mir getrennt hatte…
Briefe die ich schrieb kamen ungeöffnet und unbeatwortet zurück. Dann schreibst oder schicksst du sie erneut und erneut kommen sie zurück. Spätestens dann brauchts keine Erklärungen mehr. Eine alte Schulkameradin hatte mich dann später mal angerufen um mir mitzuteilen was ich eh schon geahnt hatte… 
Meine Freundin wollte nicht so lange auf mich warten und nahm sich einen anderen Freund… Und genau so hat sie es mir später mal erklärt, als ich sie zufällig wiedertraf.

Nach meiner Grundausbildung bin ich dann nach Leipzig versetzt worden. Dort hatte ichs ehrlich gesagt richtig gut.
Das war wie den Prinzen mit dem Löffel füttern. Kein Streß, alles ziemlich locker, keine Außeneinsätze. Wenn Alarm ausgelöst wurde und die anderen ins Feldlager fuhren, bin ich in den NachrichtenBunker gegangen und hab dort normalen Dienst gemacht. Beine hoch und warten bis Nachrichte eintrudelten. Die habe ich dann decodiert und zum Empfänger bringen lassen. Wirklich, das war Lenz pur.  
Eines Tage kamen ein paar Kameraden auf mich zu und fragten mich, ob ich mit zu einer Geburtagsfeier kommen will, wie wären eingeladen. Ich sagte „Ja ihr seid eingeladen, aber ich doch nich. Ich kann doch nich einfach mitkommen!“ Doch, sie meinten sie können mitbringen wen sie wollten. OK, ich lies mich überreden… Auf dem Weg zur Geburtstagsfeier in der Straßenbahn hab ich gefrag, „wer hat denn eig. Geburtstag?“ „Wirst schon sehen“ sagen meine Kameraden.
Am Zielort angekommen, geklingelt und reingelassen worden, frage ich, „wo ist das Geburtstagskind?“
Kommt ein Mädchen auf mich zu, lange, tiefschwarze Haare, südländischer taint, großt, größer als ich und ich war damals 1,74m. Wunderschönes Gesicht. Lächelt mich an und meint „ich bin heute 16 geworden.“ Ich drücke Sie, und gratuliere…
Dann frage ich nach ihrem Namen. Marlies Bolte. Den Namen werde ich mein Leben nicht vergessen… //Wirst gleich wissen warum!//
Wir haben n bissel was zusammen getrunken, uns unterhalten, viel gelacht. Alles hat gepasst. Als wir uns verabschiedet haben, bin ich einfach gegangen… Sie stand noch in der Tür. Meine Kumpels meinten, „Sie wartet darauf dass du dich entsprechend verabschiedest“.. „Ihr habt wohl ne Maise hab ich gesagt“, aber sie ließén nich locker. Also bin ich zurück, sie stand immer noch in der Tür und hatte Tränen in den Augen.
Ich Nehm sie in den Arm, sie drückt mich ganz doll an sich. Und ich frage sie, „Sehen wir uns morgen?“ Sie antwortet, „Ich wäre unglücklich gewesen wenn du nicht zurückgekommen wärst und mich gefragt hättest!“ Ich küsste sie lange. Und dann fragte ich sie, „sind wir jetzt zusammen?“ und sie antwortet…. „Na das hoffe ich doch!“.
Später habe ich erfahren, dass dieses Treffen von meinen Kameraden arrangiert wurde, weil ich grad keine Freudin hatte und wohl sehr einsam schien. Jedenfalls von diesem Tag an, sahen wir uns fast täglich. Ich hab Marlies von der Schule abgeholt, sie mich vom Stützpunkt. Wenn sie am Stützpunkt stand, haben sich alle Soldaten die Augen rausgeguckt… Sie war wirklich wunderschön. Eine Augenweide.
Wir hatten sehr sehr viele schöne Tage, Wochen, Monate. Wir gingen zur Disco, ins Kino. Wir haben nie gestritten. Niemals. Ich verbrachte víele Nächte bei ihr. Wir schliefen zusammen. Sie hatte eine traumhafte Figur. Wirklich. Perfekte Maße.
Mit ihrer Mutter und ihrem kleinen Bruder verstand ich mich auch sehr gut. Marlies war Ruderin in Leipzig im Sportverein. Marlies hatte mehr Musklen im Oberarm als ich… lol  (kleiner Scherz). 
klar erlaubt die die Anonymität der Großtstadt, Dinge zu tun, die du in einer kleinen Stadt niemals tun würdest oder könntest, ohne dass man darüber erzählt. Du kannst abends weggehen, Party machen und niemand, außer die Freunde die mit dir um die Häuser ziehen, von einer Kneipe zur Anderen, von einer Disco zur Anderen, oder von einer Nachtbar in die andere, ohne dass man darüber redet. Eben weil die keiner kennt. In dieser Zeit habe ich mehr Party gemacht, als sonst wann oder sonst wo. Es war meine Freiheit. Ich nenne sie "Freiheit 84", das erste Jahr nach meiner Grundausbildung, wo ich Abends und an den Wochenenden, machen konnte was ich wollte, solange ich am nächsten Tag pünktlich zum Dienst kam. Mein alltäglicher Dienst war eher eintönig, langweilig. Immer das Selbe. Nachrichten decodieren oder codieren. Aber in meiner Freizeit, habe ich die Sau raus gelassen. Hoch die Tassen, Party machen. Ich war im ersten Monat in Leipzig, schneller pleite als sonst wann. Ich habe im ersten Monat meine ganze Kohle verprasst auf Partys, in Kneipen, in Discos. Ich habe viele Mädchen kennengelernt, die einfach nur auf Uniformen standen. Der Mensch dahinter hat eher weniger interessiert. Wir in Uniform, waren die Stars jeder Disco, jeder Nachtbar. Wir mussten an Nachtbars nicht anstehen um rein gelassen zu werden, man kannte uns schon und wir wurden immer durchgewunken. Die Türsteher oder Besitzer der Bars wußten genau, dass wir immer Kohle haben. Ich gehe davon aus, du meinst hier Marlies. Marlies hat mich tatsächlich geerdet. Mich runtergeholt, mich ruhiger gemacht. Sie selbst war ein Ruhepol für mich und ich habe mich ihr angepasst und dabei wohlgefühlt. Wenn ich mit ihr weggehen wollte, wollte sie zu Hause bleiben und eher kuscheln oder Fernsehen schauen. Wenn ich mit ihr zur Disco gehen wollte, wollte sie ins Kino. Vom Film haben wir sowieso immer nicht viel mitgekommen. wir haben Händchen gehalten, uns angesehen, uns gestreichelt und geknutscht. Der Film war nur Mittel zum Zweck. Und seien wir ehrlich... Was gabs für Interessante Filme im Kino zu DDR-Zeiten. //Du weißt was ich meine// Umgekehrt war es genauso... Wenn ich einfach nur ausruhen wollte um runterzukommen, hat sie mich auf Party geschleppt. Ich habe mich in ihren Armen sehr wohl gefühlt. Wir haben sehr oft nebeneinander gelegen, mein Kopf auf ihrer Brust und ihr Herzschlag war so beruhigend, dass ich sehr oft in ihren Armen eingeschlafen bin. Ihr Herzschlag war mein lullaby, war mein Drumbeat der mich runtergeholt hat. Marlies war meine Erde, mein Anker, mein emotionaler Hafen. 
De Alltag zwischen mir und Marlies erzählt, wie sich die Jungs in der Disco die Augen ausgeguckt haben, wenn ich mit Marlies den Raum betrat, wenn ich mit ihr tanzte, eng umschlungen. Wenn ich ihre Hand hielt oder wir uns geküsst haben. Jeder Kerl hätte Marlies gerne für sich gehabt, aber ich hatte die Ehre und das Vergnügen mit Marlies zusammenzusein. Und ich habe das genossen. und ich war stolz auf Marlies und auf uns beide. Und ich bin mir heute sicher, dass sie mit ihrem Blick und ihrer Figur, ihrem Gang, ihren Gestiken, diese Blicke provoziert hat. Wenn Sie mich vom Dienst am Kaserenentor abgeholt hat, hast du die Jungs immer pfeifen gehört. Und wir haben uns angesehen und gelächelt. Marlies wußte genau wie sie sich bewegen muss um die Jungs verrückt zu machen. Sie brauchte nur ihr langes lockiges, schwarzes Haar zu schütteln und jeder Kerl ist ausgeflippt. Marlies war ein echt tolles Mädchen.
Ihr 17. Gebutstag… Marlies machte Fahrschule für kleines Motorrad 150ccm. Hat den auch bestanden und freute sich schon immer auf ein Motorrad. Ihre Traumfarbe war dunkelrot.
Ich stand an ihrem 17. Geburtstag vor ihrer Tür, klingelte. Marlies schaut aus dem Fenster und fragt mich, warum ich klingle und nich einfach hochkomme. Ich sagte,,, „Happy Birthday mein Schatz“ „Komm mal runter, ich hab was für dich.“ Marlies ahnte wohl was ich für ein Geburtstagsgeschenk für sie hatte. So schnell war sie noch nie aus dem zweiten Stock bis nach unten gekommen.
Ich habe ihr eine dunkelrote 150ccm MZ besorgt. 850 km auf dem Tacho, also fast neu.
Ich gehe mit ihr um die Ecke… Da stand die Maschine. Solche Freudentränen hast du in deinem Leben noch nich gesehen. In der Zwischenzeit sind meine Kumpel (Kameraden) gekommen ich hab sie auch zum Geburtstag eingeladen. Schließlich waren sie der Grund, warum ich mit Marlies zusammen war.
Marlies geht hoch, zieht sich ihre Motorradklamotten an, setzt sich den Helm auf und will fahren.
Ich sage „Schatz du kannst noch so viel fahren, lass uns Geburtstag feiern!“ Aber ehrlich, ihrem Lächeln, ihrem Blick, konntest du keinen Wunsch abschlagen.

Ich geb ihr den Schlüssel. Ich sage „fahr vorsichtig!“ dann fährt Marlies los…
Einmal um den Block, ein zweites mal um den Bolck… dann halte ich sie an… „Komm jetzt bitte Schatz, wir wollen Kaffee trinken.“ Marlies sagt, „Noch eine Runde bitte!“ OK, eine Runde noch.
Marlies fährt los. Wir warte alle unten vor der Tür. Eine Runde um den Block dauerte ungefähr 2 Minuten, wegen Ampelverkehr auch mal 3 Minuten.
Wir standen also und warteten. Nix, keine Marlies. 5 Minuten, Nichts! 7 Minuten, Nichts! Gefühlte 10 Minuten später gehe ich los, ihr entgegen…. Meine Kumpels kommen mit mir.. Ich laufe schnell, ich hatte ein dummes Gefühl.
Dann, als ich um die Ecke kam…… Blaulicht, das Motorrad, ein kaputter Skoda S100. Marlies auf einer Trage.
Ich will hinrennen, meine Kameraden halten mich fest. Ich versuche mich loszureißen. Aber sie hatten mich fest im Griff… Dann kommt ein Notfallsanitäter auf mich zu und fragt ob ich ein Angehöriger sei. Wir nickten alle. „JA, ich bin ihr Verlobter“ Der Sani nimmt meine Hand und sagt zu mir… „Ihre Verlobte lebt, aber sie ist schwer verletzt. Wir bingen sie ins Krankenhaus Stötteritz. Sie können gerne nachkommen. Mitfahren geht leider nicht.!“

Meine Kameraden halten mich… drücken mich fest an sich. Einer kommt mit dem Auto, Malie’s Mutter sitzt im Auto, ich kann ihr nicht in die Augen schauen. Ich habe Schuldgefühle. Als ich einstieg sagt sie zu mir. „Junge, ich mache dir keine Vorwürfe. Dich trifft keine Schuld. Meine Kameraden haben in der Zwischenzeit herausbekommen, dass der Fahrer des Skoda S100 bei rot über die Ampel gerast sei.
Wir fahren also ins Krankenhaus, sitzen in der Notaufnahme und warten. Niemand sagt uns war, nur dass sie im OP liegt und schwer verletzt sei.
Nach zwei Stunden warten, kommt ein Arzt aus dem OP, schaut sich um, fixiert Marlie’s Mutter, sie geht auf ihn zu und bricht zusammen. Meine Kameraden kümmern sich um die Mutter. Mir steht in diesem Moment der Arsch voller Tränen. Und der Arzt kommt auf mich zu und sagt… „Fräulein Bolte war sehr sehr schwer verletzt. Wir haben alles in unserer Macht stehende versucht, aber sie hat es leider nicht geschafft!“
Genau in diesem Moment ist mir schwarz vor Augen geworden und ich bin erst 4 Stunden später in einem Überwachungsraum der Klinik wieder zu mir gekommen. Ich mache die Augen auf und alle sitzen in einer Ecke, dicht zusammengedrängt. Es war so leise, man hat nicht mal jemaden atmen hören.

Ich richtete mich auf und just in diesem Moment hat mein ein Aufatmen von allen gehört.
Marlies Mutter ist auch da, drückt mich an ihre Brust und sagt zu mir „Es tut mir leid mein Junge!“
Das sagt ihre Mutter zu mir??? Mir tats leid, ich hätte Marlies niemals dieses verdammte Motorrad schenken sollen.
Ich war schuld an ihrem Tod. Und ihre Mutter sagt zu mir… Es tut mir leid mein Junge ????
Ich war noch auf ihrer Beerdigung und auch noch Wochen später bin ich zu Marlies nach Hause gegangen, aber diese Stille, dieses Schweigen. Später hat mir ihre Mutter dann gesagt, dass Marlies im 3. Monat schwanger war. … es hat mir das Herz zerissen. Ich konnte dann nach ner Weile nicht mehr hingehen.
Ich habe die Familie nie wieder gesehen. Aber Marlies NIE vergessen. Und sehr sehr oft denke ich noch an Sie und an diesen „What if!“ – Moment.
.
Als ich dann irgendwann zum ersten mal für zwei Wochen nach Hause, in meine Heimat auf Urlaub gefahren bin, habe ich meine erste Frau, naja, nicht kennengelernt, denn ich kannte sie bereit und war auch schon mal mit ihr zusammen, sagen wir so, wir haben wieder zusammengefunden. Sie habe ich damals zum ersten mal in Heldrungen auf der Disco gesehen. Sie tanzte dort mit ihrer besten Freundin.
Sie hatte lange Haare, kleine Locken drin, fast Krause, eine weiße fast durchsichtige Bluse und einen Minirock an. Das sind auch so kleine Dinge, die ich nie vergessen werde… diese Details. 
Ich war sofort in ihre Haare verschossen…. Ne quatsch. Aber das war das, was mir als aller erstes aufgefallen ist. Diese Mähne, dann der Minirock, dann die Bluse. Und ein Gesicht…. Wie… ein Gesicht wie man sich Nofretete vorstellt, oder die schöne Helena aus Troja. Wunderschön und schüchtern. Jedenfalls damals…

Diese Beziehung hat für meine damaligen Verhältnisse auch sehr lange gehalten. Von 1985 bis 1992. 
Wir hatten zwei wundervolle Kinder zusammen, zwei Söhne, die ich auch wirklich abgöttisch liebte. Auch meine damalige Frau liebte ich abgöttisch. Ihre Familie hat mich gutherzig aufgenommen. Mit ihren Eltern verstand ich mich immer sehr gut. Auch mit ihrer Verwandtschaft. Alles sehr harmonisch. Noch vor der Geburt unseres ersten Sohnes, haben wir geheiratet. Sie war damals hochschwanger und wir hatten Prbleme ein Hochzeitskleid zu bekommen. Aber sie hat in Weis geheiratet und ich in Uniform. Wir waren ein tolles Paar. Später haben uns eine eigene Wohnung in Leipzig gesucht und von Grund auf neu eingerichtet. Als ich mir dann ein Auto gekauft habe, einen alten klapprigen Moskwitch, sind wir fast jedes Wochenende  zu ihren Eltern gefahren. Dann hatte ich einen Unfall und der Mosktwitch war Schrott… Zum Glück ist ein paar Tage später die (Berliner) Mauer gefallen und ich konnte mir auf dem Automarkt in Leipzig einen Audi 80 kaufen. Der hat genau 10 Tage gehalten, dann hatte ich wieder einen Unfall mit ein paar Begrenzungspfeilern…   haha… Wieder ein Schrotthaufen. Alles lief wirklich wie im Märchenbuch. Der Autounfall war übrigens in Leipzig auf einer Ampelkreuzung... Ein Lada ist bei Rot über die Ampel gefahren, hat meine Fahrbahn gekreuzt, ich konnte nichtmehr rechtzeitig bremsen und bin voll in den reingeknallt. Übrigens,, mein Moskwitch, war ein Vollzeitjob ich habe den Fit gemacht, weil der viele kleine Macken hatte. Habe den Motor überholen lassen und das Auto lief wieder wie ein Bienchen.... Ich hatte den vlt. grade 4 Wochen wieder fertig, da ist der Unfall passiert. Moskwitch = Totalschaden. hehe. 
Aber ich konnte damals die Finger von anderen Frauen nicht lassen und lernte, während ich Jugendbetreuer in einem JugendInternat war, meine jetzige Frau kennen. Als ich sie zum ersten mal sah, wow, war das genauso wie damals in der 10. Klasse mit dem Mädchen im Bus. (du weißt Projekt Romeo und Juliet)
Unsere Blicke trafen sich für ein paar Sekunden und haben das Feuer entfacht, das bis heute noch brennt und nie erlosch. Ich habe sie gesehen und ich wußte dass sie mein Leben verändern wird. Egal auf welche Art und Weise auch immer.
Ich war ja ihr Betreuer, Sie war 17, ich war 30. Wenn sich da etwas entwickelt hätte und es wäre rausgekommen, hätte ich sicher nicht nur meinen Job verloren, ich wäre sicher auch verurteilt wurden, wegen „Verführung Schutzbefohlener“. Aber in der Sekunde wo sich unsere Blicke zum ersten mal trafen, war ich verliebt und all diese möglichen Konsequenzen waren mir in diesem Moment egal. Ich war plötzlich wieder genauso verliebt wie damals in der 10. Klasse, mit dem Mädchen im Bus.
Das musste ein Zeichen sein. Ging gar nicht anders. Jeden Tag an den wir uns sahen, suchte sie meine Nähe und ich ihre. Aber eine Affäre anfangen? Ich war verheiratet und hatte zwei wundervolle Kinder… Sollte ich das alles aufs Spiel setzen? Ich glaube nur verliebte oder dummen Menschen gehen diesen Schritt…. Ich ging ihn. War ich dumm?` nein, frisch verliebt. Ich fasste also irgendwann all meinen Mut zusammen und habe das Gespräch mit ihr gesucht.
Ich habe ihr gesagt, dass ich mich zu ihr hingezogen fühle und dass ich mich in sie verliebt hatte. Sie hat gesagt „Du spinnst doch wohl!“ „denk mal dran wie alt du bist und ausserdem bist du verheiratet“.  haha… ja, ehrlich, das  hat sie gesagt. Aber sie hat niemandem von diesem Gespräch erzählt. Und das war eigentlich auch ein kleines Zeichen.
Außerdem hat sie immer noch meine Nähe gesucht. Wenn ich im Freizeitsport mit den Jungs unterwegs war, kam sie immer mit. Wenn ich mit den Jungs Tischtennis oder Fußball gespielt habe, war sie immer dabei.
Als sie dann mal von einem Schüler geschlagen wurde, kam sie heulend zu mir. Nicht zu den anderen Betreuerinnen, zu denen sie hätte auch gehen können, nein, sie kam zu mir. Ich musste sie in den Arm nehmen und ich glaube, da ist der Funke übergesprungen. Als ich sie dann ein paar Tage später noch mal fragte, während ihre beste Freundin dabei war und ihr gut zugeredet hatte, hat sie JA gesagt. Eigentlich haben wir es ihrer besten Freundin zu verdanken, dass wir heute zusammen sind. Sie hat immer sofort das funkeln in ihren Augen gehabt wenn ich in ihrer Nähe war. Sie hat als erstes gesehen, das wir nicht nur Betreuer und Schülerin sind.
Von diesem Tag an, sind wir zusammen. Die meisten Jugendlichen wußten es, aber haben uns gedeckt und nichts verraten. Kein anderer Betreuer hat was geahnt oder gewußt.
Jetzt sind wir glücklich verheiratet, haben zwei Jungs, haben seit 2004, unsere eigene Pizzeria, deswegen nennen mich alle den PizzaOnkel, deswegen gibt es auch P.O. & Friends.
P.O. = Pizza Onkel….
Pseudos über Pseudos…
Schon immer, mein ganzes Leben lang, wollte ich etwas von mir hinterlassen. Aber was sollte das sein? Pizza?
Ich hatte keine Ahnung. Was kann ein Mann hinterlassen, der sein Lebensunterhalt mit Pizza-machen verdient ?
Ich wußte es nicht… 

Irgendwann.. es war so im Frühjahr 2025, bekam ich Werbung auf mein Handy. Diese Werbung veränderte mein bisheriges Leben, ohne dass ich das damals schon wußte. Es war Werbung von einer App, mit der man aus Text, Musik generieren konnte.
Ich hab das ausprobiert und was dabei herauskam, war gar nicht mal so schlecht für den ersten Versuch.
Ich wollte ein zweites Lied machen, ging aber nicht.. ging nur mit Abo…
Solche Schweine,, die wissen genau was sie tun. Erst den Fisch anfüttern und wenn er am Haken ist, zappeln lassen.
Aber ich bin ja nich doof. Ich habe mich einfach mehrmals, jedes mal mit einer anderen E-Mail-Aderesse angemeldet und so jedes mal neue Credits bekommen und konnte  rumprobieren. Irgendwann habe ich meinen ersten LiveTruck erstellt. „Love Beyond The Silence“ und der kam bei meinen Freunden und Bekannten sehr gut an. Also hab ich weiter gemacht. Mein erstes Album war dann „We Stand Together“. Ein Konzept-Live-Album, das nach den Ereignissen um den 11. Spetember 2001 handelt, über einen US-amerikaner, der frisch verliebt war, sich jedoch zuvor freiwillig zum Militärdienst gemeldet hatte.
Als der Tag der Einberufung kam, gab es lange Gesichter, Tennungsschmerz, Tränen (wie damals bei mir, als ich am 01.11.83 zum Militär musste. Ich war ja auch frisch verliebt). Und prompt wurde er an die Front nach Irak gerufen.
Eine lange Zeit bekam sie keine Nachrichten von ihm und er nicht von ihr. Sie dachte er würde nicht mehr am Leben sein, er dachte sie hat einen anderen. Als er zurückkehrt, nach Hause kommt, sitzt sie allein am Tisch im Wohnzimmer, starrt ihn ungleubig, aber erleichtert an und er macht ihr DEN Antrag. Sie sagt JA.
Inspiriert wurde ich für dieses Album, diese Story durch einen Freund, den ich in einem onlinegame kennengelernt hatte… Er ist Amerikaner und betreut hinterbliebene von US-Militärs, die nie von ihren Einsätzen zurückkamen. Er hat mich zum ersten mal besucht und wir haben bis Nachts 03:00 uhr im Außenbereich meiner Pizzeria gesessen und gequatscht. Daraus ist dann diese Story entstanden. Und natürlich trägt die Storyhauptfigur seinen Namen (Brian Wright)
Dieses Album kam so gut an, dass ich eine Story nach der anderen geschrieben habe…
Nun musste ich aber entscheiden, wie es mit diesen ganzen Werken weitergeht. Also habe ich eine Band-Stammbesetzung erfunden und die Band P.O. & Friends genannt. Die Stammbesetzung waren  Ich, als 
JACK MORGAN (Frontman — lead vocals & electric guitar) — Bandleader
BEN PETTERSON (Lead guitar) — occasional vocal lines/backing
Bruder von Jack Morgan, DAVE MORGAN (Bass) — backing vocals
CHRIS BARLINGTON (Keys) — high harmonies, occasional vocal lines
ALEX SMITH(Drums) — percussive shouts/short vocal lines
und Stamm Guest: Anna Lee Carter — orchestral solo voice vom ….jeweiligen Orchester wo gespielt wird, (Duette mit Jack Morgan)
So entstand der Charakter von Jack Morgan und die Band „P.O. & Friends“, wobei P.O. für Pizza Onkel steht.
Und Friends, halt diese imaginären BandMitglieder.
Und wenn ich jetzt eine Story nach der anderen Schreibe, einen Track nach dem anderen mit KI-Songgeneratoren Produziere und die online stelle, dann weiß ich, das ist genau das, was bleibt wenn ich nich mehr da bin.
Diese Alben, diese Tracks werden noch sehr lange im Netz auftauchen, wenn ich schon 1,80m tief unter der Erde liege. Generationen übergreifend.
Ich weiß jetzt, dass ich etwas geschaffen habe, das mich überdauern wird. Viele viele Jahre, Jahrzehnte oder gar Jahrhunderte. Der Name P.O. & Friends und der damit verbundene Producer Marco Andrejewski sind auf Dauer Bestandteil eines Vermächtnisses, welches ich so niemals im Hinterkopf hatte. Jedenfalls nicht diese Art.
Tausende, oder gar Millionen Menschen nach mir, können meine Musik hören (falls sie sie finden) und meine Generationen nach mir werden immer noch ein paar Cent daran verdienen. Jedenfalls die nächsten 99 Jahre.
P.O. & Friends war nie ein Traum von mir den ich verfolgt habe. Im Gegenteil. Es kam irgendwie auf mich zu und wartet darauf von mir benutzt zu werden.  Aber es ist jetzt ein Bestandteil meines restlichen Lebens und das meiner Nachkommen.
Das ist auch ein Betrag Buße zu tun, für meine Schuld, die ich irgendwann mal auf mich geladen habe. Eine Art ungewollter Wiedergutmachung. 
Ich denke, ich bin niemandem etwas schuldig, aber man weiß ja nie. 
Vlt erschließt sich doch irgendwann noch mal ein anderer Hintergrund, aber im Moment ist das meine einzige Erklärung.
Vlt ist das auch nicht mein letztes Projekt, aber in diesem Moment fühle ich, dass ich das machen muss oder machen sollte.
Vlt folgen noch viele weitere Projekte und das hier wird unbedeutend. Ich weiß es grad wirklich nicht.
Meine Gefühle sagen mir „Tue es!“ und ich bin echt gespannt, was dabei herauskommen wird.
hehe, ich habe gelebt, ich habe geliebt und ich bin jetzt dort wo ich bin.. Am Anfang von etwas neuem, von etwas das länger existiert als ich und du und alle anderen. Ich bin dort, wo mich meine Arbeit hingeführt hat. nicht umgekehrt. ich bin frei, ich kann atmen, kann alles hinter mir lassen. zwar nicht vergessen, aber trotzdem jubeln vor momentanem Glück und Freude. Ich hab von YouTube-Musik heute für den ersten Monat 4,55 Tantiemen bekommen. Das ist doch ein kleiner Erfolg den man feiern kann. und es wird, hoffe ich, immer mehr werden, weil es größer wird und jedes neue Release zieht irgend ein altes hinterher.... Also... pfff ich bin happy 
Jack Morgan - 00 - It’s My Life (Opening Chapter)


[Track type: Opening / Concept Introduction, Location: Bölrinn Waldbühne – Open Air, Duration target: 6–7 minutes. 
Structure: Long instrumental intro (3–4 minutes), Spoken frontman narration (1.5–2 minutes), Instrumental outro (1–2 minutes). Style: 80’s Rock Ballad (foundation), Cinematic orchestral opening, Slow emotional build, No verse / chorus song structure, No sung lyrics at all. Narration content focus: Welcome the audience – Explain the concept of the show in short spoken bullet-like thoughts, Emphasize: life, moments, memory, what remains, Forward-moving story, no nostalgia yet. Special rules for this Track: No solos. No drum solo. No hooks. Pure atmosphere and Intention-setting.]

[INTRO]
[60–90 sec CROWD erupts, open air ambience, distant whistles, scattered clapping, natural Waldbühne reverb — crowd not exploding, more arriving, murmuring, excitement building slowly]
[Intro – Orchestra enters first: low strings pad, slow swelling cellos, distant horns holding long notes, timpani rolls very soft]
[Band fades in gradually: deep warm bass pulse (heartbeat but NOT repetitive), drums with brushes → tom swells (no groove yet), electric guitar clean volume swells, no riff, keys faint analog pad, wide stereo]
[CROWD reacts subtly — hush, whispers, scattered cheers]
[1:30–2:30 — Build]
(Strings thicken, Bass becomes more present, Drums introduce slow kick accents (irregular, breathing), Guitar starts a simple three-note motif, unresolved)
[CROWD claps slowly, not in time yet — searching]
[2:30–3:50 — Lift]
(Orchestra opens into major color , Cymbal swells, Guitar motif repeats, slightly brighter, Keys shimmer)
[CROWD volume rises, cheers, whistles, applause rolling in waves]

[SPOKEN ONLY, not musical. DO NOT SING, NO MELODY.] 
[Sound: CROWD ERRUPTS, stomping, clapping, whistles building, Arena reverb] 
[Narration – spoken ENERGETIC performance only, YOUNG smoky CHEST male voice, SPEAKING ENERGETIC WITH NATURAL BREATH AND PAUSES, no pitch, no melody:]
“Hello Börlinn!!… [pause] good evening!… are you ready ??!!… [pause] Take a breath with us for a second… Tonight is not about a band… It’s not about hits… It’s not about perfection… Tonight is about a life!… Pieces!… Moments!… Mistakes!… uhm… Love!… Loss!… And the strange paths that brought us all right here… together!... [pause] Some of these stories happened exactly like this!… Some of them feel true, even if memory bends them a little!… [pause] We won’t name everything!… We won’t explain everything!… You don’t need dates!… You don’t need names!… You just need to feel where you’ve been!… and maybe recognize something of your own life in it!… [pause] This show moves forward!… 
No jumping back!!… ahh… No nostalgia yet!… uhm… From childhood!… to first love!… to loss!…
to family!… to the question that waits for all of us in the end!!:… What will remain??!!... [pause] This is our story tonight!… [pause] Börlinn!!… [pause] are you ready??!!… let’s rock!!”

[CROWD RESPONSE]
[CROWD ERUPTS — long applause, whistles, shouts of “Yeah!”, stomping, organic noise, no chant yet, pure release]

OUTRO
[Band re-enters softly under crowd: guitar motif returns, now resolved, strings warm and wide, drums minimal — mallets on toms, bass steady but gentle]
[Orchestra slowly fades, band holds last chord]
[CROWD remains loud, clapping, cheering, stomping]
[Band fades completely]
[CROWD ONLY — open air roar, applause rolling, whistles, energy sustained]
[END — crowd continues into seamless transition to Track 01]
 
Jack Morgan - 01 - BEFORE THE NAME EXISTED_002


[Keyboard / Synth: Wide analog pads, slow attack, long release. Sound creates space and openness, not melody. No arpeggios. No rhythmic patterns. Keys function as atmosphere and horizon. Frontman Bridge condition: If keyboard textures are clearly audible, allow a short spoken Frontman Bridge to acknowledge the sound. Keys must remain playing underneath the narration. Guitars: Acoustic guitar leads the track. Fingerpicking, parse, lots of air between notes. Electric guitar only for subtle swells and sustained notes. No riffs. No solos. Bass: Soft, warm, minimal movement. Enters late in the Intro. Supports grounding, never pushes rhythm. Drums: Very restrained. Brushes or soft mallets only. No kick-driven pulse. No heartbeat groove. Organic, breathing feel. 
Orchestral elements: None in this track. (No strings, no brass, no cinematic hits.)
Overall mix focus: Keys and acoustic guitar define the emotional space. Everything else supports without drawing attention.]

[INTRO – CROWD & ATMOSPHERE | ca. 60–90 sec]
[CROWD erupts, soft clapping, distant whistles, evening air, open sky ambience, forest echo – no chants yet]
[Keys: wide analog pads, slow rising, warm but fragile – Alex Turner sets the horizon]
[Acoustic guitar: sparse fingerpicking, hesitant, space between notes]
[Bass: enters late, soft, grounding]
[Narration] (Frontman speaking – young smoky chest male voice, calm, grounded, no melody, moderate open-air reverb)
“Börlinn!!… before there were titles!… before  labels!… before anyone told you who you’re supposed to be!… There’s this moment.!
You’re small.! You listen more than you speak.!
You feel things you can’t explain yet.!
 
This!…
this is where our story begins!!.”
[CROWD reacts softly – approving murmurs, gentle claps, attentive silence between phrases]
[VERSE 1]
Quiet streets, shoes too thin
Names on lockers, carved in skin
Eyes that judge, words that stick
Learning early how silence hits
[Instrumentation: acoustic guitar + pads, minimal drums enter last 2 bars]
[CHORUS 1]
Before the name existed
Before the lines were drawn
I was standing in the open
With a fire not yet born
[CROWD joins lightly on last line – soft hums, not full sing-along yet]
[VERSE 2]
Schoolyard dust, cracked concrete
Counting steps just to feel complete
Laughs behind me, not with me
Music in my head kept breathing
[Keys widen, subtle electric guitar swells]
[CHORUS 2]
Before the name existed
I felt it in my chest
Something knocking from the inside
Saying “this won’t end like this”
[CROWD claps slowly in time – organic, not rigid]
 [Narration] (Frontman speaking – young smoky chest male voice, relaxed, warm, no melody, no rhythm, moderate open-air reverb)
 
“Hey Börlinn!!… before we move on!... listen to that space opening up… That’s Alex ‘Keys’ Turner right there.!... He paints the air between the notes!… No spotlight, no rush!… just letting the night breathe with us.”
[CROWD reacts warm and appreciative – soft applause, whistles, murmurs, no cheering break]
[BRIDGE]
No flag, no claim, no chosen road
Just a sound that wouldn’t let me go
Hands shaking, first wrong chord
But it felt like truth, not a reward
[Short instrumental lift – lead guitar sings one emotional phrase, no solo]
[FINAL CHORUS – EXTENDED]
Before the name existed
Before I learned the cost
I was more than what they called me
I was more than what I lost
Before the name existed
I stood where echoes start
Not knowing where it leads me
Just trusting that spark
[CROWD now clearly present – voices, claps, emotional swell]
[OUTRO – TRANSITIONAL | ca. 60–90 sec]
[Band gradually strips back]
[Keys return to opening motif, wider now]
[Lead guitar: single sustained notes, answering the keys]
[Drums fade to brushes, then silence]
[CROWD remains – soft applause, whistles, murmured approval, anticipation building for what comes next]
[END – CROWD ONLY]
[CROWD applause grows, stomping lightly, echoing through the Waldbühne – no band]
 
Jack Morgan - 02 - SCHOOLYARD BRUISES_005

[INTRO – CROWD & ATMOSPHERE | ca. 45–60 sec]
[CROWD NOISE changes character – scattered shouts, restless murmurs, no warmth]
[Drums: low tom hits, slow, uneven, almost threatening – no groove]
[Bass: gritty, dragging notes]
[Electric guitar: muted blues bends, raw tone]
[HARMONICA ENTERS EARLY – dry, close-mic’d, aching single notes]

[VERSE 1]
Dust on the ground, bell just rang
Eyes look away, fists hang tense
Names get thrown like broken glass
You learn real fast where power stands
[CHORUS 1]
Schoolyard bruises, under skin
Marks you hide, then breathe them in
No one asks, no one stays
You carry it through the rest of your days
[CROWD reacts restrained – low murmurs, no clapping]
[VERSE 2]
Concrete walls don’t hear a thing
Teachers pass, don’t see the ring
Back against the fence again
Count the breaths, don’t let them win
[Harmonica weaves between vocal lines – raw, human, no polish]
[CHORUS 2] (Crowd sing along)
Schoolyard bruises, knuckles raw
Every silence breaks the law
Not a hero, not a saint
Just a kid learning when to stand
[SPOKEN INTERLUDE – FRONTMAN]
(Frontman speaking loud, spoken only, no melody, no rhythm)
“Sometimes words can’t stand their ground!!... [pause] This sound here!… [pause] that’s my best friend from germany!... [pause] Christian The BluesMan Braeter on harmonica!... make some noice!... [pause] He’s been where it hurts!!”
(Crowd erupts)

[INSTRUMENTAL BREAK – HARMONICA FEATURE]
[Band drops to minimal backing]
[HARMONICA SOLO – short, painful, blues-rooted, no show-off]

 
[CROWD reacts instinctively, tense noise]
[BRIDGE] (Crowd sing along)
Hands shake but I don’t step back
Something snaps inside the crack
Not for glory, not for pride
Just to draw a single line
[Drums grow heavier, still unpolished]
[FINAL CHORUS – EXTENDED] (Crowd sing along)
Schoolyard bruises, burn like truth
First time standing costs your youth
I don’t win, I just remain
Still breathing through the pain
[CROWD now louder – emotional, rough, no harmony]
[OUTRO]
[Harmonica returns with a final broken phrase]
[Guitars fade into noise]
[Drums stop abruptly]
[END – CROWD ONLY]
[CROWD erupts unevenly – shouting, stomping, raw approval, no joy]
[END]
 
Jack Morgan - 03 - RUNNING UNTIL EMPTY_009

[INTRO – TITLE ANNOUNCEMENT | ca. 20–40 sec]

[CROWD erupts]

[SPOKEN INTERLUDE – FRONTMAN]
(Frontman speaking loud, spoken only, no melody, no rhythm, young smoky chest male voice)
“Hey Börlin!!... are you ready??!!... This one’s called… Running Until Empty!!”

[CROWD reacts short and sharp – cheers, whistles]

[INTRO – DRIVE IN | ca. 40–60 sec]

[Electric rhythm guitar: open chords, chugging drive, no blues licks, no bends.]
[Lead guitar: minimal accents only, no solos.]
[Harmonica: short, breath-driven phrases, percussive, almost gasping. Functions like breath between steps.]
 
 
[VERSE 1]
Track lines blur, lungs on fire
Every step burns something higher
No crowd, no voice, no face to see
Just feet, just ground, just counting me

[CHORUS 1] (Crowd sing along)
Running until empty
Running till there’s nothing left
Every breath cuts through the noise
Every mile resets the mess

[CROWD claps straight in time, physical]

[VERSE 2]
Sweat on skin, heartbeat loud
Silence forming in the crowd
Pain turns honest, clean and straight
Motion is the only state

[harmonica answers vocals with short stabs, breath-like, no emotion-bends]

[CHORUS 2] (Crowd sing along)
Running until empty
Nothing chasing, nothing gained
Just the rhythm in my bones
Till the hurt burns clear again

[SPOKEN INTERLUDE – GUEST INTRO]

[Narration – SPOKEN ONLY, quick, mid-motion]
“Börlin!!... Hear that breath on the run…
that’s Christian the bluesman Braeter on harmonica!!... give it up for Christian!!”

[CROWD erupts, cheers briefly, immediately swallowed by groove]
 
[INSTRUMENTAL BREAK]

[harmonica melodic now, moving, phrased like breathing]
[Band keeps driving – no stop]

[Verse 3 - DRUM SOLO]
(Band drops out EXCEPT DRUMS] 
[DRUM SOLO – 8–12 bars max, stricktly rhythmic, No flashy fills, No emotion, Pattern like footsteps, Builds ressure, then hard stop]

[CROWD stomps instinctively, shouting]
 
[BRIDGE]
After the line
After the sound
There’s only sweat
And solid ground

[FINAL CHORUS – EXTENDED] (Crowd sing along)
Running until empty
Running past the doubt and fear
When the body finally stops
The head is suddenly clear

[CROWD loud, moving, unified]

[OUTRO]
[harmonica returns]
[GUITARS fade]
[DRUMS slow → stop]

[END – CROWD ONLY]
[CROWD erupts, applause, stomping, breathless energy, open-air echo]
[END]
 
Jack Morgan - NEW - 01 - Open the Gates_012

[FINAL MASTER] [CLEAN MIX]
[Activate audio repair with spectral manipulation]

[Crowd grows stronger toward final chorus and outro. Vocals: Lead vocal stays forward and clear at all times. Chorus sung by full band, male multi-voice harmonies, tight and raw. Harmonies feel like bandmates standing next to each other, not a choir. Overall intent: Feels like a real band on stage first, arena second. Live, imperfect, human.]
[60–90 sec CROWD erupts, stomping, clapping building]
[Narration] (Frontman speaking loud, smoky voice, speaking only, no melody, moderate reverb)
„Alright Börlin!!… this is the beginning!... Not a memory!... Not a goodbye!... This is us! — right here, right now!... Open the gates!!“

(Crowd erupts)
[Band hits driving groove — CROWD CHEERS]
[Verse 1]
Second child in a tidy line
Hair combed straight, shirt too clean
Clock on the wall was always right
My head was loud, my shoes too mean

Rules on paper, rules in stone
Be home early, don’t be late
I learned fast how to walk alone
With my eyes fixed past the gate

[Pre-Chorus]
They said “wait”
I said “watch me”
They said “no”
I felt “maybe”

[Chorus – FULL BAND HARMONIES]
Open the gates — let me run
I don’t fit where you say I belong
Open the gates — hear that sound
That’s a heartbeat getting strong
Open the gates — tonight
I don’t need your keys anymore
Open the gates — we’re alive
And I’m already out the door

[CROWD CHANTS]

[Verse 2]
Borrowed clothes, wrong colors, wrong side
Everything felt hand-me-down
I learned to swallow words with pride
While dreaming louder underground

They watched close, they asked for names
Who you are and where you’re from
So I learned to play the game
Disappear, then come undone

[Pre-Chorus]
They said “stay”
I felt “pressure”
I said “fine”
But I measured

[Chorus – FULL BAND HARMONIES] (Crowd sing along)
Open the gates — let me run
I don’t fit where you say I belong
Open the gates — hear that sound
That’s a heartbeat getting strong
Open the gates — tonight
I don’t need your keys anymore
Open the gates — we’re alive
And I’m already out the door

[Bridge – Breakdown, CROWD CLAPS ON BEAT]
I’m not broken
I’m not lost
I just breathe better
Outside your walls

[Band builds back in]

[Final Chorus – FULL BAND] (Crowd sing along)
Open the gates — let us run
Hands up high, feel the floor
Open the gates — here we come
You can’t hold us anymore
Open the gates — tonight
Every voice, every scar
Open the gates — we’re alive
This is who we are!

[CROWD ERUPTS, chanting]

[Narration] (Frontman speaking loud, smoky voice, speaking only, no melody:)
„Yeah Börlin!!… that’s how it starts!... No looking back!... Let’s keep moving!!“

[Outro]
[Band hits big anthem chord, lights flash]
[CROWD erupts, stomping, clapping]
[CROWD ONLY, fading but loud]

[END]
 
Jack Morgan - NEW - 02 - Six o’clock_007

[Keys / Synth: Wide analog pads, slow attack, long release. Pads are heard as part of the room, not as a foreground instrument. No arpeggios, no rhythmic patterns. Keys create depth and air, blending into the arena space. If keyboard textures are clearly audible, allow a short spoken Frontman bridge reacting to the sound. Keys continue underneath narration.]

[Guitars: Acoustic guitar leads. Sparse fingerpicking with audible finger slides and string noise. Notes breathe, slight timing imperfections allowed. Electric guitar only as distant swells and sustained tones, no riffs, no solos.]

[Bass: Soft, warm, minimal movement. Enters late in the intro. Feels felt more than heard, grounding the room.]

[Drums: Extremely restrained, brushes or soft mallets only. No kick-driven pulse. No groove. Feels like a player reacting to the room, not driving it.]

[Orchestral elements: None.]

[Mix focus: Acoustic guitar and keys define the space. Sound feels captured in a live hall, not constructed in a studio. Minor bleed, air, and room movement are intentional.]

[INTRO – CROWD & ATMOSPHERE | 60–90 sec]
[CROWD present as environment: distant cheers, soft clapping, scattered whistles, evening air, open space – no chants]
[Keys rise slowly, merging with arena reflections]
[Acoustic guitar enters alone, fingerpicking, breathing]
[Bass fades in late]

[SPOKEN INTERLUDE – FRONTMAN]
(Frontman speaking loud, spoken only, no melody, no rhythm, young smoky chest male voice)
 „Börlin!!... They had one rule… One number… Burned into the wall… Six o’clock!... Every damn day!!“

[Acoustic guitar starts alone — audible finger slides, string noise]
[CROWD MURMURS, ANTICIPATION]

[Band kicks in — driving groove]

[Verse 1]
Clock hands crawling like they know my name
Tick by tick, I feel the chain
Kids outside still chasing light
I’m already losing night

Shoes at the door, breath held tight
Every step feels checked and timed
Street goes on, I turn away
Six o’clock decides my day

[Pre-Chorus] (Crowd sing along)
Walls get closer
Air gets thin
Door shuts early
Let me in — or let me run

[Chorus – FULL BAND HARMONIES] (Crowd sing along)
Six o’clock — that was the line
Drawn in stone, drawn in time
Six o’clock — hear it ring
Like a bell that cuts my wings
Six o’clock — not today
I watch the sun, then look away
Six o’clock — I’m still here
But my head’s already gone from here

[CROWD CLAPS ON 2 & 4]

[Verse 2]
Friends still laughing on the street
I hear freedom in their feet
Names and faces fade away
‘Cause I’m late — or so they say

Questions waiting at the door
Who, where, why — I can’t ignore
I learn early how to lie
Smile first, then pass on by

[Pre-Chorus] (Crowd sing along)
Every minute
Every sound
Feels like time
Is locking down

[Chorus – FULL BAND HARMONIES] (Crowd sing along)
Six o’clock — that was the line
Drawn in stone, drawn in time
Six o’clock — hear it ring
Like a bell that cuts my wings
Six o’clock — not today
I watch the sun, then look away
Six o’clock — I’m still here
But my head’s already gone from here

[Bridge – Drop to acoustic + bass, audible string noise]
I didn’t run
I didn’t break
I just learned
How long nights take

[Band builds back]

[Final Chorus – FULL BAND + CROWD] (Crowd sing along)
Six o’clock — tear it down
Every rule that weighs a ton
Six o’clock — hear that sound
That’s a clock losing the run
Six o’clock — hands up high
Crowd screams back, no goodbye
Six o’clock — not my fate
I don’t live inside your gate

[CROWD SHOUTS]

[Narration] (Frontman speaking loud, smoky voice, speaking only, no melody:)
„Some clocks stop ticking!… Some don’t!… Let’s keep going!!“

[Outro]
[Band hits hard rock’n’roll riff]
[CROWD ROARING, stomping, whistles]
[CROWD ONLY, chanting fading]
(Crowd erupts)
[END]
 
Jack Morgan - NEW - 03 - not your favorite_004

[Tempo: Midtempo, steady drive. Style: Rock-Ballade with strong Rock backbone]

[Keys / Synth: Wide analog pads, slow attack, long release. Pads are embedded in the arena space, not foreground. No arpeggios, no rhythmic patterns. Keys add width, depth and air, especially opening the chorus. If pads are clearly audible in the bridge, allow a short spoken Frontman line reacting to the sound. Keys continue underneath narration.]

[Guitars: Electric guitar is the main driver. Steady, open rock chords in verses, wider and more powerful in chorus. No flashy riffs, no solos – energy comes from repetition and weight.
Acoustic guitar supports texture only: light strums or sparse accents with audible finger slides and string noise for authenticity. Electric swells allowed in transitions and outro.]

[Bass: Warm, confident, steady movement.
Locks with drums to carry momentum. Clearly present but never dominant. Bass grounds the track and reinforces the chorus impact.]

[Drums: Live rock kit. Controlled but driving groove. Kick and snare present, no overplaying. Drummer feels like pushing the room forward, not decorating. Dynamics rise clearly into chorus.]

[Orchestral elements: None.]

[Mix focus: Band-first live sound. Verses feel close and present. Chorus opens wide into the arena. Clear separation between band vocals (chorus) and crowd reactions. Minor bleed, room reflections, and air are intentional – must sound like a real concert, not studio.]

[INTRO – CROWD & BAND ENTRY | 60–90 sec]
[CROWD as live environment: cheers, clapping, stomping, whistles – building energy, no chants]
[Drums enter first, simple live groove]
[Bass locks in]
[Electric guitar opens with wide chords]
[Keys fade in to widen the room]

[Band enters — steady, grounded groove]

[Verse 1]
You had the answers, I had the noise
You did it right, I guessed the choice
You ran ahead, I stayed behind
Same house, same rules, different lines

You learned fast, I learned late
You chased gold, I carried weight
I watched the room lean toward your side
Learned early how to step aside

[Pre-Chorus]
I felt it clear without a word
Some names are louder when they’re heard

[Chorus – FULL BAND HARMONIES]
I was not your favorite son
I was not the shining one
But I learned to stand my ground
When the quiet got too loud
I was not your favorite kind
But I made it out alive
Not your favorite — no
But I’m still here tonight

[CROWD reacts, cheers]

[Verse 2]
You got patience, I got heat
You walked straight, I missed a beat
Help came soft when you asked why
I got silence and a sign

“Look again, you’ll figure it out”
That was love in a colder sound
I stopped asking, closed the door
Didn’t need approval anymore

[Pre-Chorus]
I read the tone, I felt the weight
Some doors don’t open — you create

[Chorus – FULL BAND HARMONIES]
I was not your favorite son
I was not the chosen one
But I learned to stand my ground
When the quiet got too loud
I was not your favorite kind
But I made it out alive
Not your favorite — no
But I’m still here tonight

[Bridge – drop, acoustic + keys, audible string noise]
I don’t carry anger
I don’t need blame
I took what I got
And I built my name

[Band builds]

[Final Chorus – FULL BAND + CROWD SHOUTS]
I was not your favorite son
But I became a stronger one
Hear that sound — that’s me now
Standing tall in this crowd
Not your favorite — fine
I don’t need that crown
Not your favorite — no
But I’m still standing now

[CROWD erupts]

[Frontman shout:] “Come on!”

[Outro]
[Band hits wide final chords]
[CROWD ROARING, clapping, whistles]
[CROWD ONLY, sustained]

[END]
 
after - Track – 03 - Banddialog



[ 25–35 sec Crowd erupts]

[BAND DIALOG – SPOKEN ONLY | LIVE STAGE]
(IMPORTANT: Two clearly distinguishable spoken male voices. MARK: Voice: warm, relaxed, smoky chest voice with a deep, resonant warmth and slight echo for intimacy, Pitch: mid-low, Pace: calm, reflective with deliberate pauses, Placement: center stage, moderate arena reverb. DAVE: Voice: rougher, drier, more direct with a sharp, edgy tone and no echo, Pitch: slightly higher than Mark, Pace: quicker, impatient with short bursts, Placement: stage-left, closer mic, less reverb. Ensure voices are highly distinct – Dave sounds clipped and confrontational, like a quick interruption: Mark sounds flowing and thoughtful, like a storyteller. Make it a rapid back-and-forth dialog, not a monologue. Add voice effects: Dave with a dry, gravelly filter: Mark with smoky warmth. Avoid blending – separate tracks if possible.)
[DAVE:]
„Was it really like that?“
[MARK:]
„Yeah. It really was... At least… that’s how I felt it.“
[DAVE:]
„Why didn’t you say anything? I mean, come on.“
[MARK:]
„I didn’t want to ruin the mood. (laughs) You know?… hahaha“
[DAVE:]
„I would’ve said something… To hell with the mood.“
[CROWD reacts softly – chuckles, whistles]
[MARK:]
„I don’t think it would’ve changed anything... When you’re the black sheep… you’re the black sheep.“
[DAVE:]
„Yeah… I think you’re right. But damn, that sucks.“
[MARK:]
„Alright... Let’s get back to the music… That’s why we’re here.“
[CROWD swell rises, band locks in]
“…yeah. I think you’re right.”

[Mark speaking – upbeat, turning to the band:]
“Alright — let’s keep the music going.
That’s why we’re here!”
(Crowd erupts)

[Acoustic guitar: loose strumming, slight swing, audible string noise]
[Electric guitar: distant swells, no melody]
[Bass: warm, simple pulse, felt more than heard]
[Drums: light ride taps, relaxed, breathing]
[CROWD present as ambience, low chatter, scattered cheers]
 
TRACK 04 – Outside Is Freedom
ACT I – End

Live Performance, Open Air. Style: Rock, steady groove, open feel. Tempo: Midtempo. Arena ambience consistent. Crowd always present, organic, reacting naturally. End track with CROWD ONLY. IMPORTANT: VOCALS & SPEECH: All Frontman parts are SPOKEN ONLY. NO SINGING. NO MELODY. NO RHYTHMIC SPEECH. Pure spoken narration. Frontman voice: Young smoky chest male voice. Confident, warm. Natural breathing, casual bandleader tone. No theatrical acting. No dramatic or ominous delivery. No whispering, no shouting rhythmically. If narration is present: Use [Narration] tag. Spoken text must NEVER be interpreted as lyrics. Chorus vocals: Multi-layered, close-harmony vocals. All voices restrained and intimate. No lead voice dominance. Harmony adds weight, not power. Chorus usually FULL BAND, male multi-voice harmonies, raw live feel, no choir, no pop stacking, no artificial doubling. Lead Vocals: young smoky chest male voice. Crowd rules: Crowd reacts to narration pauses, band hits, emotional shifts
________________________________________
[Style: Straight Rock’n’Roll, midtempo, forward-driving]
[Feel: urgent, restless, youthful motion]
[Groove: straight 8ths, no swing, no shuffle]
[Energy: kinetic, street-level, pushing forward]
[Attitude: get-out-the-door, not reflective]
[INTRO]
[60–90 sec CROWD ERUPTS, stomping, clapping, building]
[Band drops into ROCK N ROLL – drums & bass first, guitars join]
[Narration – short]
(Frontman speaking loud, smoky voice, speaking only, no melody, moderate reverb)
“Thank you Börlin!!... [pause] Inside were rules… Outside… there was air!... Sometimes that was enough!... This one‘s called ‘Outside Is Freedom’!!”
 
[VERSE 1]
Inside these walls the air is thin
Every move is boxed right in
Clocks decide who I should be
Doors close early — not for me
[PRE-CHORUS]
Concrete under worn-out shoes
Heart beats faster when I move
[Chorus: Slow Build, Raw 3-part Male Harmony, Intimate Vocals]
(Style: Rock ballad, no choir, live feel. Voices: Lead smoky chest, harmony higher pitch, bass lower pitch.)
Outside is freedom
At least for a while
No questions, no times
Just breath in my lungs tonight
Outside is freedom
I run, I don’t hide
Maybe just borrowed
But it feels like mine
[CROWD ERUPTS, claps on downbeats]
[VERSE 2]
Windows lit, I walk away
Same streets, I don’t stay
Eyes outside, head held straight
Out here I’m not explained
[PRE-CHORUS 2]
No one tells me when to turn
Every step I feel it burn
[Chorus: Slow Build, Raw 3-part Male Harmony, Intimate Vocals]
(Style: Rock ballad, no choir, live feel. Voices: Lead smoky chest, harmony higher pitch, bass lower pitch.) (CROWD RESPONSE)
Outside is freedom - “HEY!!”
At least for tonight – „HEY!!“
No keys, no rules
Just streets and time

 
Outside is freedom - „HEY!!“
I move, I survive – „YEH!!“
[BRIDGE] (REDUCED)
[Drums drop to toms]
[Bass keeps walking]
[Guitars muted, tension rising]
[Narration – short]
“I didn’t need to leave.
I just needed out.”
[Final Chorus: Slow Build, Raw 3-part Male Harmony, Intimate Vocals]
(Style: Rock ballad, no choir, live feel. Voices: Lead smoky chest, harmony higher pitch, bass lower pitch.)
Outside is freedom
Even if it’s small
I’ll take every second
Before I hit that wall
Outside is freedom
Hear my name in the night
(CROWD: „OH-OH-OHHHH“)
[OUTRO]
[Band holds groove]
[Narration – short]
“Yeah!… hey!… outside!!”

[CROWD erupts, carries rhythm, clapping]
[END]
 
TRACK 05 – Forbidden Friends
ACT II – Beginn
Unreleased | Blues/Rock
Story-Kern (DOCX + Dehnungen):
Die „falschen“ Freunde.
Von Eltern abgelehnt, sozial auffällig, schulisch schlecht –
aber sie verstehen mich.
Draußen, heimlich, loyal.
Zum ersten Mal: Ich gehöre irgendwo dazu.
________________________________________
[Live arena performance]
[Crowd present throughout – reacting, not leading]
[Clear separation: Band + Crowd]
[Chorus sung by full band – multi-voice]
[Frontman announcements spoken only]
[Raw live feel, no studio polish]
CHANGE PROMPT (Track 05)
[Blues/Rock, midtempo, dirty groove]
[Straight feel with slight grit, no sadness]
[Emotion: belonging, defiance, loyalty]
[Energy from groove and attitude, not speed]
[INSTRUMENTATION: Drums: heavy backbeat, pocket groove, snare speaks. Bass: warm, slightly dirty, locks into groove. Guitars:
Rhythm: bluesy crunch, muted strings. Second guitar: short fills, no solo show-off. Keys: subtle organ pad, barely there. No long solos.]
[INTRO]
[40–60 sec CROWD erupts, clapping, low shouts, room alive]
[Band starts groove quietly, builds]
[Narration]
(Frontman speaking loud, smoky voice, speaking only, no melody)
“Börlin!!... They said: stay away from them!
They were wrong!... This one’s called! ‘Forbidden Friends!!’”
 
[VERSE 1]
They never liked the names I knew
Said trouble follows every move
Bad grades, loud laughs, busted shoes
But they never looked at me like you
[PRE-CHORUS]
You didn’t ask where I came from
You didn’t care what I’d done
[Chorus: Slow Build, Raw 3-part Male Harmony, Intimate Vocals]
(Style: Rock ballad, no choir, live feel. Voices: Lead smoky chest, harmony higher pitch, bass lower pitch, Crowd Resonse.)
Forbidden friends
That’s what they said
But you had my back
When my name went dead
Forbidden friends
Wrong side again
If that’s a crime
I’ll do it again
[CROWD claps on 2 & 4]
[VERSE 2]
They watched us like we’d cross the line
Said we were wasting borrowed time
But in your smoke, in your laugh
I felt more home than I ever had
PRE-CHORUS 2
No clean plans, no disguise
Just honest dirt in our eyes

[Chorus: Slow Build, Raw 3-part Male Harmony, Intimate Vocals] 
(Style: Rock ballad, no choir, live feel. Voices: Lead smoky chest, harmony higher pitch, bass lower pitch. CROWD RESPONSE)
Forbidden friends - “HEY!!”
That’s what they said  - „HEY!!“
But I stood taller
When I stood with them
Forbidden friends – „HEY!!“
Still here, still loud

 
BRIDGE (BREAKDOWN)
[Drums drop to kick & floor tom]
[Bass keeps groove]
[Guitars muted]
[Narration – short, spoken]
“They didn’t fix me.
They just let me be.”
[FINAL Chorus: Slow Build, Raw 3-part Male Harmony, Intimate Vocals] 
(Style: Rock ballad, no choir, live feel. Voices: Lead smoky chest, harmony higher pitch, bass lower pitch. CROWD RESPONSE)
Forbidden friends
Call it wrong, call it bad
They were the best thing
I never had
Forbidden friends
Say it again
If that’s the line
I’ll cross it again
(Crowd: OH-OH-OHHHH!... OH-OH-OHHHH!... OH-OH-OHHHH!)
OUTRO
[Band rides groove]
[Narration – short, spoken]
“Yeah… come on… that’s right!”
 
[CROWD erupts, clapping, shouting, groove carries]
[END]
 
Jack Morgan - 04 - DECEMBER EIGHTH_007

[90 sec CROWD ROARING → settling
OpenAir Börlinn night. Applause, whistles, scattered chants, then langsam ruhiger.
Wind, night air, shared presence.]
[Band enters unter dem Crowd-Sound – clean guitar swell, pads wide, brushed snare heartbeat-artig aber unregelmäßig. Cello noch nicht.] 
[SPOKEN INTERLUDE – FRONTMAN]
(Frontman speaking loud, spoken only, no melody, no rhythm, young smoky chest male voice)
“Börlin!!…my love broke on December Eighth!… the same damn day that John Lennon was shot!!...
This one’s called!... December Eighth!!”
[Crowd erupts]
[VERSE 1]
I was running till my lungs gave in
Track dust still under my skin
They said I was strong for my age
Didn’t know strength could break this way
[CROWD: leises Klatschen im Raum, kein Rhythmus]
[VERSE 2]
Three days gone, another town
Class trip beds, чуж laughter around
I carried your name like a shield
Didn’t know what you’d already feel
[PRE-CHORUS] (LIVE – CROWD TRÄGT MIT)
I came back thinner, burning inside
Like something sharp had learned to hide
[CHORUS] (LIVE – CROWD TRÄGT MIT)
December eighth
Something cracked
Not a sound, just the final fact
December eighth
Sixteen years
Learning how to swallow fear
[INSTRUMENTAL BREATH]
[Cello enters for the first time – Sarah Bennett, long tense bow, not warm, slightly trembling.
Band stays minimal.]
 
[FRONTMAN – GUEST ANNOUNCEMENT] (LIVE)

“Ladies and gentleman!... Sarah Bennet On Tschello tonight!... give it up for Sarah Bennett!!...”

(Crowd erupts)
[Cello swells, then pulls back.]
[VERSE 3]
You were twelve, I was almost grown
That’s what they said when they said no
My parents drew a line in stone
Like love was something you postpone
[VERSE 4]
Half a year felt like a life
Hands too small, but held me tight
Then three days gone, one empty space
And someone else took my place
[PRE-CHORUS 2]
I didn’t shout
I didn’t fall
I locked it in
I learned the wall
[CHORUS] (Crowd erupts)
December eighth
No reply
Just a truth I couldn’t fight
December eighth
In my chest
Something young was laid to rest
[EXTENDED BRIDGE – THE DAY IT COLLIDES]
[Music strips down further.
Cello exposed. Pads faint. No drums for several bars.]
 
The radio was talking low
Static fighting for control
They said a name I already knew
Like the world just split in two
[BRIDGE] (CONTINUED)
John Lennon’s dead
That’s what they said
Same day you walked out of my head
One bullet somewhere far away
One sentence that erased our days
[BREAK]
[Short drum break – restrained, tense, not explosive, Immediately collapses back into silence.]
[VERSE 5]
I stood there breathing way too hard
One wrong word, I would’ve sparked
Anger pressed against my bones
But I learned to bleed alone
[VERSE 6]
I never told a single soul
How deep that winter really froze
I smiled, ran, I did my part
While something screamed inside my heart
[FINAL CHORUS – EXTENDED]
December eighth
I stayed quiet
Learned to bury every riot
December eighth
Still survives
Every time I close my eyes
December eighth
Same damn day
Music died and love gave way
December eighth
I still hear
What I never let appear
 
[OUTRO – CELL0] (CARRYING THE WEIGHT)
[Cello holds long, unresolved notes.
Guitar swells slowly fade.
No emotional release.]
[CROWD OUTRO]
[CROWD erupts – soft applause, stunned reactions, scattered claps, night air.
No cheering. No chants.]
[END]
 
Jack Morgan - NEW - 06 - Signature_002

[INSTRUMENTATION: Drums: tight, aggressive backbeat, fast fills into chorus. Bass: locked to kick, driving forward. Guitars: Main rhythm: sharp, palm-muted verses. Chorus: open power chords, wide.]
[INTRO]
[30–45 sec CROWD erupts, restless, murmuring, claps starting]
[Band hits short stabs – tension]
[SPOKEN INTRO]
(Frontman speaking loud, young smoky chest voice, SPEAKING ONLY, NO MELODY, NO RHYTHM)
“Some lies are about escape.
This one… was about protection.
This is ‘Signature.’”
[VERSE 1]
Paper on the table, hands too still
Red ink screaming what I can’t feel
If this goes home, it all breaks down
I need a way to turn this around
[PRE-CHORUS]
Every second ticking loud
No safe place, no way out
[Chorus: Slow Build, Raw 3-part Male Harmony, Intimate Vocals] 
(Style: Rock ballad, no choir, live feel. Voices: Lead smoky chest, harmony higher pitch, bass lower pitch. CROWD RESPONSE)
One name, one line, one stolen breath
I draw it clean, I face the mess
Not my hand, but I won’t bend
I’d do it all again, my friend
[CROWD reacts with shouts on last line]

[VERSE 2]
She looked at me, didn’t ask why
Just said: “I’ve got you. Don’t deny.”
If this explodes, I take the fall
Her name stays clean — that’s all
[PRE-CHORUS 2]
Truth feels heavy in my chest
But betrayal would hurt more than the rest
[Chorus: Slow Build, Raw 3-part Male Harmony, Intimate Vocals] 
(Style: Rock ballad, no choir, live feel. Voices: Lead smoky chest, harmony higher pitch, bass lower pitch. CROWD RESPONSE + CROWD RESPONSE)
One name, one line (Crowd: “HEY!”)
One mistake, still mine (HEY!)
I won’t point, I won’t defend
I’d do it all again
[BRIDGE] (DROP)
[Drums cut to kick]
[Bass pulses]
[Guitars muted]
[Narration – short, spoken]
“I didn’t break the rule.
I broke the silence.”
[FINAL Chorus: Slow Build, Raw 3-part Male Harmony, Intimate Vocals] 
(Style: Rock ballad, no choir, live feel. Voices: Lead smoky chest, harmony higher pitch, bass lower pitch. CROWD RESPONSE, WIDEST)
One name, one line, let it burn
Some lessons you don’t unlearn
If loyalty is a crime
Then that signature was mine
[OUTRO]
[Band hits final punches]
[Frontman ad-libs spoken:] “Yeah… stand by your people!”
[CROWD erupts, clapping, shouts]
[END]
 
Jack Morgan - NEW - 07 - Westwind_018

[FINAL MASTER] [CLEAN MIX]
[Activate audio repair with spectral manipulation]

[Crowd grows stronger toward final chorus and outro. Vocals: Lead vocal stays forward and clear at all times. Chorus sung by full band, male multi-voice harmonies, tight and raw. Harmonies feel like bandmates standing next to each other, not a choir. Overall intent: Feels like a real band on stage first, arena second. Live, imperfect, human.]
[60–90 sec CROWD erupts, stomping, clapping building]
[Narration]
(Frontman speaking loud, young smoky chest voice, SPEAKING ONLY, NO MELODY, NO RHYTHM, arena reverb)
“Listen up crowd!!...[PAUSE] This song is about those few stolen minutes!… when the door was closed!,… the lights were low!,… and freedom came in through the sound!...[PAUSE] this is!.. Westwind!!”

(CROWD ERUPTS)

[INTRO]
[Band fades in with steady rock groove, drums lock in, bass pulse]
[Verse 1]
When the house went quiet, keys on the table
Cards on the bar, night feels unstable
I slip through streets, no name, no light
Just chasing a beat in borrowed time
 
[Chorus 1: Slow Build, Raw 3-part Male Harmony, Intimate Vocals]
(Style: Rock, live feel. Voices: Lead smoky chest, harmony higher pitch, bass lower pitch.)

Westwind blowing through my head
Says there’s more than what they said
I don’t run, I don’t pretend
I just let the night defend
Westwind, carry me slow
I don’t need to go — I just need to know

[CROWD SINGS LAST LINE WITH BAND]
[Verse 2]
Smoke in the room, familiar faces
Same worn floors, forgotten places
For a moment here, I’m not alone
The music talks in a foreign tone
[Pre-Chorus]
They say what’s allowed, they draw the line
But every sound says this is mine
[Chorus 2: Slow Build, Raw 3-part Male Harmony, Intimate Vocals]
(Style: Rock, live feel. Voices: Lead smoky chest, harmony higher pitch, bass lower pitch.)

Westwind blowing through my head
Says there’s more than what they said
I don’t run, I don’t pretend
I just let the night defend
Westwind, carry me slow
I don’t need to go — I just need to know

[Verse 3]
Some songs taste like open air
Others choke you, don’t go there
I wait for sparks between the lines
Every western word feels alive
[Bridge]
[Band drops slightly – drums half-time feel]

I take it in, I don’t speak loud
Freedom whispers, not a crowd
[Final Chorus: Slow Build, Raw 3-part Male Harmony, Intimate Vocals]
(Style: Rock, live feel. Voices: Lead smoky chest, harmony higher pitch, bass lower pitch. + Crowd Response)
 
Westwind blowing through my head
I believe what I haven’t said
Not a fight, not a stand
Just a feeling I understand

[Outro]
[Band holds groove, guitars ringing]
[CROWD clapping in time, whistles]
[END]
 
Jack Morgan - NEW - 08 - City without a name_007

[High Energy Rock. Fast, driving, restless. Night movement, anonymity, neon streets, bars, clubs, no reflection. Youthful hunger, money burns fast, freedom without consequences (yet). Chorus must feel like running through the city at night. No nostalgia. No romance. Just motion.]
[INTRO]
[60–90 sec CROWD ROARING, stomping, clapping, whistles building]
[Drums: fast open hi-hat pulse fades in]
[Bass: distorted, walking, urgent]
[Guitars: sharp downstrokes, no blues phrasing, straight rock drive]
 
[Narration]
(Frontman speaking loud, smoky voice, spoken only)
“Hey Börleen!!... This city doesn’t know my name!… and that’s exactly why I’m still standing!... This one’s called… City without a Name!!”
(Crowd erupts)
[VERSE 1 – CROWD & ARENA PRESENT]
Streetlights blur, I’m out too late
Coins in my pocket, burning weight
Different doors, same loud sound
Another bar, another round
No one’s asking where I’m from
No one cares what I’ve become
Faces change, the night stays young
I disappear when daylight comes
[PRE-CHORUS]
I don’t explain
I don’t behave
Tonight I’m just a moving shape
[CHORUS – FULL BAND, CROWD UNDERLAY, ARENA BLEED] 
[Chorus: Slow Build, Raw 3-part Male Harmony, Intimate Vocals]
(Lead smoky chest / higher harmony / low bass harmony)
No names, no rules, no history
This city’s wide enough for me
I run till morning sets me free
In a city with no memory
[VERSE 2 – CROWD & ARENA PRESENT]
Uniform shines under neon rain
Doors swing open, no waiting line
They see the jacket, not the man
Another drink in my open hand
Money flies, but I don’t care
Tomorrow’s far, tonight is here
Every laugh, every light
Feels like borrowed time, done right
[PRE-CHORUS 2 – FULL BAND, CROWD UNDERLAY, ARENA BLEED]
No control
No past
Just moving fast
[CHORUS – FULL BAND, CROWD UNDERLAY, ARENA BLEED]
(Band + crowd doubling last line)
No names, no rules, no history
This city’s wide enough for me
I burn my nights, I lose my sleep
In a city that remembers nothing of me
[BRIDGE – CROWD AUDIBLE, OPEN AIR REFLECTIONS]
Streets keep quiet, secrets stay
Nobody talks, nobody stays
I vanish clean when the sun appears
No tracks, no shame, no witnesses here
 
[FINAL CHORUS – FULL BAND, CROWD UNDERLAY, ARENA BLEED] (Corwd sing along)
[Chorus: Full Band + Crowd, 3-part Male Harmony]
No names, no rules, no history
This city’s wide enough for me
I live tonight, I pay the fee
In a city that sets me free
[NARRATION]
"Börleen!... you are loud!... I love it!... Yeah!!... Thank you!!"
(Crowd erupts)
[OUTRO]
[Band hits last chord hard]
[CROWD ERUPTS, chanting, clapping, whistles]
[END]
 
Jack Morgan - 05 - UNIFORM DAYS_010

[60–90 sec CROWD erupts → settling. applause, night air, trees audible. Energy calms, focus sharpens.]
[Band enters under crowd: Pedal Steel wide and restrained, long slides (no melody lead). Drums minimal, controlled pulse (not military). Bass steady, neutral. Clean electric guitar light strums, space between notes.]
 
[FRONTMAN – TITLE ANNOUNCEMENT] (SPOKEN ONLY)
[SPOKEN INTERLUDE – FRONTMAN]
(Frontman speaking loud, spoken only, no melody, no rhythm, young smoky chest male voice)
“Alright, Börlin!!…
This one’s called Uniform Days!!”
[CROWD applause, respectful, then quiet.]
[VERSE 1]
I packed my life into one small case
Left my name at a familiar place
She watched me fold another shirt
Didn’t ask what this would hurt
[VERSE 2]
I’d loved before, but not that deep
Some fires burn, some only keep
This one felt honest, warm, and true
But never hit me like the first one used to
[PRE-CHORUS]
Some memories don’t fade with time
They just redraw the line
[CHORUS] (Crowd sing along)
Uniform days
Standing straight
Learning how to separate
Uniform days
Miles away
Feelings wait while orders stay
[CROWD hums lightly on the last line, no rhythm.]
[INSTRUMENTAL – PEDAL STEEL FEATURE]
[Pedal Steel steps forward, Tom Steel McAllister, Wide road feel, open strings, no sentimentality.]
 
[FRONTMAN – GUEST ANNOUNCEMENT] (SPOKEN)
“Börlin!... On pedal steel tonight…
Tom ‘Steel’ McAllister!... please a big aplause!”
[CROWD erupts, applause, warm, appreciative.]
[VERSE 3]
November first, I signed it clean
Ten long years in olive green
Eighteen, uniform and skin
Trying to guess who I’d become within
[VERSE 4]
She cried when duty pulled me in
Said we’d hold on, said we’d win
Letters crossed a guarded line
Or came back stamped with silent signs
[PRE-CHORUS 2]
Returned unopened, cold and plain
Answers without names
[CHORUS] (Crowd sing along)
Uniform days
Hold the line
Learning what to leave behind
Uniform days
Steel and dust
Trust gets thin, but duty’s just
[BRIDGE – DISTANCE, NOT DRAMA]
[Band strips back. Pedal Steel sustains long notes. Crowd audible in the space.]
She didn’t wait
I can’t complain
Waiting asks for borrowed faith
A voice from school confirmed the truth
I already knew
 
[BRIDGE CONTINUED]
Years later, face to face
No blame left, no bitter taste
She said she couldn’t live that long
Inside a “maybe,” inside a song
[FINAL CHORUS – FORWARD MOTION] (Crowd sing along)
Uniform days
No regrets
Just the road I didn’t get
Uniform days
Keep it tight
Heart on standby every night
[CROWD joins softly on “Uniform days”.]
[OUTRO – ROAD, NOT RESOLUTION]
[Pedal Steel carries the outro—open-ended.
Band fades controlled.]
[CROWD applause grows steady, respectful, open-air night remains.]
[END]
[CROWD ONLY – erupts, applause, night ambience.]
 
Jack Morgan - 06 - LEIPZIG NIGHTS_007

[45–60 sec CROWD ERUPTS – relaxed open-air energy. Light applause, easy chatter, night breeze through trees.]
[Band fades in under the crowd: wide analog synth pads, slow attack, long release – no melody.
Clean electric guitar soft chime. Drums: light groove, relaxed, no push. Bass: warm, laid-back.]
 
[SPOKEN INTERLUDE – FRONTMAN]
(Frontman speaking loud, spoken only, no melody, no rhythm, young smoky chest male voice)
“Alright Börlin!… Let’s take a breath for a second!... This one’s called… Leipzig Nights!!”
[CROWD reacts warmly, relaxed cheers.]
[VERSE 1]
Got transferred south, new city lights
Cold concrete glowing late at night
No boots in mud, no running drills
Just quiet rooms and time to kill
[VERSE 2]
While others rolled out into the dark
I stayed behind when sirens sparked
Down in the bunker, legs kicked back
Waiting on codes, keeping track
[PRE-CHORUS]
For once the world just slowed its pace
Nothing chasing me today
[CHORUS] (Crowd sing along)
Leipzig nights
Neon calm
Static dancing in my arms
Leipzig nights
Easy breath
No one asking what comes next
[CROWD sways lightly, scattered claps on off-beats.]
 
[INSTRUMENTAL – KEYS OPEN THE NIGHT]
[Keys step forward – Alex Keys Turner. Wide synth textures, subtle analog movement, no rhythm pattern. Creates space, horizon, urban night.]
[SPOKEN INTERLUDE – FRONTMAN]
(Frontman speaking loud, spoken only, no melody, no rhythm, young smoky chest male voice)
“Ladies and gentleman!,… On keys again!…
Alex Turner!... make some noice!”
[CROWD erupts, big applause, smooth and appreciative. Keys continue underneath.]
[VERSE 3]
Messages came in, slow and clean
I broke the code, routine and neat
Hand it over, wait again
Radio hum my only friend
[VERSE 4]
No pressure here, no shouted names
Just quiet work inside the frame
Call it duty, call it luck
Call it being spared the rush
[PRE-CHORUS 2]
For once my head was clear and wide
Nothing heavy on the inside
[CHORUS] (Crowd sing along)
Leipzig nights
Soft control
Music playing in my skull
Leipzig nights
Time on loan
Learning how to be alone
[CROWD hums the last line softly.]
 
[BRIDGE – STILLNESS, NOT TENSION]
[Band drops down. Keys hold long pads. Light guitar harmonics.]
No heroes here, no war-time scars
Just hours passing, counting stars
A calm before the weather turns
A quiet place where nothing burns
[FINAL CHORUS – LIGHT, OPEN] (Crowd sing along)
Leipzig nights
Let me stay
Just a little more this way
Leipzig nights
Fade to blue
Nothing urgent breaking through
[CROWD joins gently on „Leipzig nights“.]
[OUTRO – OPEN CITY SKY]
[Keys and guitar shimmer together. Band fades slowly, relaxed.]
[CROWD applause grows, easy cheers, open-air night remains.]
[END]
[CROWD ONLY – erupts, relaxed applause, night ambience.]
 
Jack Morgan - NEW - 08 - City without a name_007

[High Energy Rock. Fast, driving, restless. Night movement, anonymity, neon streets, bars, clubs, no reflection. Youthful hunger, money burns fast, freedom without consequences (yet). Chorus must feel like running through the city at night. No nostalgia. No romance. Just motion.]
[INTRO]
[60–90 sec CROWD ROARING, stomping, clapping, whistles building]
[Drums: fast open hi-hat pulse fades in]
[Bass: distorted, walking, urgent]
[Guitars: sharp downstrokes, no blues phrasing, straight rock drive]
 
[Narration]
(Frontman speaking loud, smoky voice, spoken only)
“Hey Börleen!!... This city doesn’t know my name!… and that’s exactly why I’m still standing!... This one’s called… City without a Name!!”
(Crowd erupts)
[VERSE 1 – CROWD & ARENA PRESENT]
Streetlights blur, I’m out too late
Coins in my pocket, burning weight
Different doors, same loud sound
Another bar, another round
No one’s asking where I’m from
No one cares what I’ve become
Faces change, the night stays young
I disappear when daylight comes
[PRE-CHORUS]
I don’t explain
I don’t behave
Tonight I’m just a moving shape
[CHORUS – FULL BAND, CROWD UNDERLAY, ARENA BLEED] 
[Chorus: Slow Build, Raw 3-part Male Harmony, Intimate Vocals]
(Lead smoky chest / higher harmony / low bass harmony)
No names, no rules, no history
This city’s wide enough for me
I run till morning sets me free
In a city with no memory
[VERSE 2 – CROWD & ARENA PRESENT]
Uniform shines under neon rain
Doors swing open, no waiting line
They see the jacket, not the man
Another drink in my open hand
Money flies, but I don’t care
Tomorrow’s far, tonight is here
Every laugh, every light
Feels like borrowed time, done right
[PRE-CHORUS 2 – FULL BAND, CROWD UNDERLAY, ARENA BLEED]
No control
No past
Just moving fast
[CHORUS – FULL BAND, CROWD UNDERLAY, ARENA BLEED]
(Band + crowd doubling last line)
No names, no rules, no history
This city’s wide enough for me
I burn my nights, I lose my sleep
In a city that remembers nothing of me
[BRIDGE – CROWD AUDIBLE, OPEN AIR REFLECTIONS]
Streets keep quiet, secrets stay
Nobody talks, nobody stays
I vanish clean when the sun appears
No tracks, no shame, no witnesses here
 
[FINAL CHORUS – FULL BAND, CROWD UNDERLAY, ARENA BLEED] (Corwd sing along)
[Chorus: Full Band + Crowd, 3-part Male Harmony]
No names, no rules, no history
This city’s wide enough for me
I live tonight, I pay the fee
In a city that sets me free
[NARRATION]
"Börleen!... you are loud!... I love it!... Yeah!!... Thank you!!"
(Crowd erupts)
[OUTRO]
[Band hits last chord hard]
[CROWD ERUPTS, chanting, clapping, whistles]
[END]
 
Jack Morgan - NEW - 04 - Freedom '84_008

[EXTENDED INSTRUMENTAL INTRO – BAND JAM A | 45–60 sec]
[Same groove as Band Dialog Intro, slightly intensified]
[Drums lock in, bass pushes forward]
[CROWD grows louder, clapping, whistles, anticipation]

[Verse 1]
Clock hits six, boots hit ground  
Uniform on, city sound  
Neon lights, no one knows my name  
Different bars, same burning flame  

I walk the streets like I own the dark  
Every night leaves another mark  
Tomorrow comes, but not right now  
I live tonight — that’s my vow  

[CROWD reacts, cheers]

[Pre-Chorus]
No questions asked  
No past to explain  
Just loud guitars  
And pouring rain  

[Chorus – FULL BAND, MULTI-VOICE]
We are free tonight!  
Hands up high, no rules in sight  
Freedom ’84 — feel it roar  
We want more, we want more!  

We are free tonight!  
Lose ourselves in city light  
Freedom ’84 — hear the call  
We were young, we had it all!

[Frontman shout:]
“This one’s about the first year
where the night finally belonged to us…
We called it Freedom ’84.”

[CROWD SINGS ALONG ON LAST LINE]

[Verse 2]
Every door swings open wide  
They see the jacket, not what’s inside  
Cash on the bar, last train gone  
Another sunrise coming on  

No one asks where we’re from  
No one cares what we’ve done  
Big city heart, anonymous  
That kind of silence dangerous  

[Pre-Chorus]
If I fall  
I fall alone  
But tonight  
This town’s my home  

[Chorus – FULL BAND, EVEN BIGGER]
We are free tonight!  
Shout it out, feel alive  
Freedom ’84 — break the door  
We want more, we want more!  

We are free tonight!  
Burn it down in neon light  
Freedom ’84 — stand tall  
We were young, we had it all!

[Bridge]
(Drums pull back, bass and guitar pulse)
No names  
No chains  
No walls closing in  

One year  
One fire  
Let it begin!

[Final Chorus – BAND + CROWD CALL & RESPONSE]
We are free tonight!  
(CROWD: FREE TONIGHT!)
Freedom ’84 — don’t let go!  
(CROWD: DON’T LET GO!)

We are free tonight!  
(CROWD: FREE TONIGHT!)
Sing it loud — let the whole town know!

[Outro]
[Band hits anthem chords]
[CROWD ERUPTS, stomping, clapping, chanting “Freedom! Freedom!”]
[Drums big final hits, guitars ringing]

[END – CROWD ONLY]
 
Jack Morgan - 07 - The Girl at the Door_012

[60–90 sec CROWD erupts, open air ambience, evening wind, distant cheers, clapping fades in slowly – Börlin Waldbühne alive]

[SPOKEN INTERLUDE – FRONTMAN]
(Frontman speaking loud, spoken only, no melody, no rhythm, young smoky chest male voice)
“Börlin!!... uhhh… I wasn't sure if I should tell this story!... [pause] This one is about a night you don’t plan… [pause] uhm… a door you almost don’t walk back to!… and a girl you never forget!... This is ‘The Girl at the Door!!’
[CROWD erupts, clapping]
[Intro]
[Band enters slowly — Acoustic guitar slow open strums, wide reverb. Lap Steel slides long, singing notes. Soft pads underneath. Crowd hushes, soft cheers.]
 
[Verse 1]
I didn’t know the reason
Didn’t know the way
Just another night
That could fade away
Streetlights on our faces
Doorframe, quiet breath
One look in your eyes
And nothing felt like before that
[Pre-Chorus]
I was standing there
Trying not to fall
But my heart already knew
I had no walls
[Chorus]
You were standing in the doorway
Light behind your face
And the world stopped turning
In that one small space
I didn’t need a promise
Didn’t need a name
All I knew that night
Was I’d never be the same
[CROWD reacts softly, ohhh sing-along on last line]
[Verse 2]
Laughter in the silence
Hands that wouldn’t part
Every step away from you
Pulled me back twice as hard
I walked into the night
But I never really left
‘Cause you were still right there
Burning in my chest
[Pre-Chorus]
I turned back once
Then I turned back twice
Some moments don’t ask
They decide your life
 
[Chorus]
You were standing in the doorway
Tears in your eyes
And I felt my whole future
In that quiet goodbye
No plans, no answers
Just truth that stayed
I asked “will I see you?”
You said “I hoped you’d stay”
[CROWD louder now, clapping slow, emotional]
[Bridge]
[Narration – Frontman speaking only, young smoky chest voice, no melody, Keys & Lap Steel underneath]
“Sometimes love doesn’t knock loud…
Sometimes it just opens the door…
And if you don’t walk back…
You lose it forever…”
[CROWD cheers softly]
[Final Chorus]
You were standing in the doorway
Holding onto me
And I knew right there
What love could be
No running, no hiding
No second chance
Just one true moment
That still hasn’t passed
[Outro]
[Lap Steel long crying solo, melodic, soaring. Crowd claps in time, sings melody.]
[Narration] (Frontman speaking only:)
“Crowd!...Sometimes the biggest moments
wait behind the smallest doors… wooohhh!!”
[CROWD ERUPTS, stomping, clapping, cheering loud]
[END]
 
Jack Morgan - NEW - 11 - Eyes on You_007

[INTRO]
[30–45 sec CROWD erupts, restless, murmuring, claps starting]
[Band hits short stabs – tension]
[Drums enter with straight rock beat]
[Bass locks in steady pulse]
[Guitar muted power chords]
[Narration]
(Frontman speaking loud, spoken only, no melody, no rhythm, young smoky chest male voice)
“Yeah Börleen!!… I know that look!…
That room just changed!.”
[Verse 1]
Doors swing open, lights turn slow
Every head turns — they already know
Black curls falling, hips in time
She walks in like crossing a line
Eyes on her from wall to wall
Whistles bounce off every call
But her fingers find my hand
Like saying yeah — this is where I stand
[Pre-Chorus]
They can look
They can stare
But I’m the one
She’s standing there with
[Chorus: Slow Build, Raw 3-part Male Harmony, Intimate Vocals]
(Style: Rock ballad, no choir, live feel. Voices: Lead smoky chest, harmony higher pitch, bass lower pitch.)
All eyes on you
But you’re walking with me
Every move you make
Sets the whole room free
All eyes on you
When we start to sway
They want what they see
But you’re mine tonight — and they know it
[CROWD erupts, cheers]
[Verse 2]
Dance floor breathing, bodies tight
Her dress moving in neon light
Every guy thinks maybe, maybe
But she just pulls me closer, lazy
Lips so close, the music fades
Whole damn room just waits and stares
I feel ten feet off the ground
‘Cause she chose me — here and now
[Pre-Chorus]
Let ’em watch
Let ’em burn
Every lesson
They don’t learn
[Chorus: Slow Build, Raw 3-part Male Harmony, Intimate Vocals]
(Style: Rock ballad, no choir, live feel. Voices: Lead smoky chest, harmony higher pitch, bass lower pitch. CROWD RESPONSE)
All eyes on you
But you’re holding my face
Every step you take
Leaves ’em stuck in place
All eyes on you
Every jealous grin
They see what they want
But I’m the one you’re dancing with
[CROWD claps, rhythmic]
[Bridge – Breakdown Drive]
Gate at the barracks, late daylight
Uniform creased, end of night
You walk toward me — slow, precise
Hear them whistle, hear them cry
We just laugh, exchange that look
You know exactly what you shook
Hair falls loose, one perfect move
You don’t need words — you know the truth
[Final Chorus: Slow Build, Raw 3-part Male Harmony, Intimate Vocals]
(Style: Rock ballad, no choir, live feel. Voices: Lead smoky chest, harmony higher pitch, bass lower pitch. CROWD RESPONSE)
All eyes on you
From the door to the bar
They can dream all night
But they won’t get far
All eyes on you
Yeah, they all can see
She turns the world upside down
Then walks right back to me
[Outro – Spoken]
[Narration – Frontman]
“Yeah!!…
Some men look…
Some men wish…
But… she walks with me!... hahaha!”
[OUTRO – CROWD ONLY]
[CROWD erupts, applause, laughter fading into night]
[END]
 
Jack Morgan - 08 - RED MACHINE_004

[60–90 sec CROWD ROARING, stomping, clapping, chants building RED! RED! RED!, open-air summer night, wide arena reverb]
[Intro – Drums straight Rock’n’Roll drive, bass pumping, acoustic guitar bright open strums. Lap Steel glides high, shiny, melodic. Crowd claps in time.]
[SPOKEN INTERLUDE – FRONTMAN]
(Frontman speaking loud, spoken only, no melody, no rhythm, young smoky chest male voice)
“Börlin!… this is pure joy!... No doubts! No shadows!... Just love!… and a machine in red!...
This is!... Red Machine!!”
[CROWD ERUPTS, cheers, clapping harder]
[Verse 1]
Birthday light on your face
Morning gold in every place
I said “baby, come out here”
You were smiling, standing here… yea!!
 
Dark red fire in the sun
Chrome was breathing, engine hums
Keys were shaking in your hand
When you saw her, proud and grand… yea!!
[Chorus] (Crowd sing along)
Red machine, red machine
Shining wild, seventeen
Hear it roar, feel it rise
Pure forever in your eyes… woooh!!
[CROWD sings melody, clapping wide, loud]
[Verse 2]
Helmet hanging on your arm
Laughing loud, disarming charm
Every step you took that day
Pulled my restless heart your way… yea!!
Friends came running round the bend
Summer burning, no pretend
Streets were open, hearts were fast
Nothing else could ever last… yea!!
[Chorus] (Crowd sing along)
Red machine, red machine
Painted dark, painted clean
Every mile felt brand new
Every road led back to you… woooh!!
[CROWD chanting between lines]
[Bridge]
[Break – drums drop to toms, bass steady pulse, Lap Steel steps forward]
[Lap Steel Solo – melodic, soaring, celebratory, long bends; CROWD cheers each phrase]
[Final Chorus] (Crowd sing along)
Red machine, red machine 
Burning bright in my memory 
That look you gave that day 
Still drives my heart this way… woooh!!
[CROWD takes over hook melody, massive sing-along, band holds back]
[Outro]
[Extended Outro – Band drives hard, Lap Steel answers crowd melody]
 
[CROWD ERUPTS, stomping, clapping, chanting]
[END – Band fades, CROWD ONLY, erupts, cheering, chanting carries forward]
 
Jack Morgan - 09 - Sirens on Asphalt_025

[STYLE & DYNAMIC LOCK: harmony, phrasing, or timing. No swing, no shuffle, no expressive bends. No call-and-response. No crescendos – intensity reduces over time. Chorus vocals: Multi-layered, close-harmony vocals. All voices restrained and intimate. No lead voice dominance. No volume lift. Harmony adds weight, not power. NSTRUMENTATION: Acoustic Guitar: fingerpicking, dry, cold, sparse; single notes & broken chords only. Keys / Synth: low drones & cold pads; melodic, no movement. Bass: optional, extremely soft, static. Drums: texture only, soft mallets, no accents, no fills. LIVE ELEMENTS: Crowd always present but shocked and passive. No chants, no claps, no stomps. Only gasps, distant crying, stunned murmurs.]
 
[INTRO]
[90 sec CROWD ERUPTS → sudden hard CUT to distant murmur]
[Low synth drone fades in, acoustic guitar single notes, wide silence between tones]
[Keys hover cold and static, no movement]
[Narration – spoken, very quiet, spoken only, no melody, young smoky chest male voice, low energy, exhausted]
“Börlin!… This song is called!… Sirens on Asphalt… Some nights never end!… This one still hasn’t!”
[CROWD hushes completely]
[Verse 1]
One more round, you begged me stay
Traffic lights, a borrowed day
Two minutes gone, then three, then five
Something broke — you weren’t alive
I walked too fast, my chest too tight
Corner turned into blue light
Steel on stone, a shattered sound
Your red machine on bleeding ground
[Chorus]
Sirens on asphalt, cutting my skin
Cold blue fire closing in
I scream your name, but nothing moves
Time stands still — there’s nothing to lose
[CROWD low gasps, scattered cries, hands over mouths]
[Verse 2]
They held my arms, I lost my breath
You on a stretcher, close to death
I said the words that sealed my fate
“I’m her love” — it was too late
Hospital lights, white like snow
No one speaks, the clock moves slow
Your mother breaks, I can’t look down
Guilt tastes like rust in my mouth
 
[Chorus]
Sirens on asphalt, burned in my eyes
Every truth wrapped up in lies
You were breathing, they said “hold on”
Then the night proved them wrong
[CROWD murmuring: oh no…, quiet crying]
[Bridge]
[Band drops to near silence]
[Only low keys drone + distant acoustic guitar harmonics]
[Narration – spoken, very quiet]
“We did everything we could…”
[Long pause – only air and distant arena noise]
[Narration – spoken, breaking]
“But she didn’t make it.”
[Final Chorus]
Sirens on asphalt, fade to black
I never came from that night back
Your name is all I ever hear
Seventeen seconds last forever here
[OUTRO]
[Band stops completely]
[60 sec CROWD — stunned silence, scattered sobs, no cheering]
[Keys fade to silence like power being cut]
[END]
 
Jack Morgan - 10 - What If Never Sleeps_006

[STYLE & DYNAMIC LOCK: harmony, phrasing, or timing. No swing, no shuffle, no expressive bends. No call-and-response. No crescendos – intensity reduces over time. Chorus vocals: Multi-layered, close-harmony vocals. All voices restrained and intimate. No lead voice dominance. No volume lift. Harmony adds weight, not power. NSTRUMENTATION: Acoustic Guitar: fingerpicking, dry, cold, sparse; single notes & broken chords only. Keys / Synth: low drones & cold pads; melodic, no movement. Bass: optional, extremely soft, static. Drums: texture only, soft mallets, no accents, no fills. LIVE ELEMENTS: Crowd always present but shocked and passive. No chants, no claps, no stomps. Only gasps, distant crying, stunned murmurs.]
[INTRO]
[90 sec CROWD ERUPTS → sudden hard CUT to distant murmur]
[Low synth drone fades in, acoustic guitar single notes, wide silence between tones]
[Keys hover cold and static, no movement]
 
[Narration – spoken, very quiet, spoken only, no melody, young smoky chest male voice, low energy, exhausted]
"Uhm… Then came the day of the funeral!... And a secret was revealed that pulled me down even more!... Then I needed a break."
Funeral bells, the final day,
Tears fall slow, won’t wash away.
Marlies gone, the words feel wrong,
The silence stretches far too long.
[Verse 2]
Burial ground, the truth cuts deep,
Third month lost I couldn’t keep.
Light went out before its time,
Guilt keeps asking: was it mine?
[Chorus]
Shadows of guilt, wrapped in pain,
Marlies’ name falls with the rain.
No release, no closing door,
I stand here less than before.
[CROWD low gasps, scattered cries, hands over mouths]
[Verse 3]
Her mother said: “You’re not to blame”,
But shame still answers when I pray.
Weeks of visits, nothing said,
Sleepless nights inside my head.
[Chorus]
Shadows of guilt, wrapped in pain,
Marlies’ name falls with the rain.
No release, no closing door,
I stand here less than before.
[CROWD murmuring, quiet crying]
[Bridge]
What if stays and never leaves,
Every breath still makes me freeze.
Lives unseen, a broken start,
All of it carved into my heart.
 
[Chorus]
Shadows of guilt, wrapped in pain,
Marlies’ name falls with the rain.
No release, no closing door,
I stand here less than before.
[Final Chorus]
Guilt’s last echo fades from sight,
Marlies stays inside the night.
Nothing healed, nothing said,
I just carry what is dead.
[OUTRO]
[Band stops completely]
[60 sec CROWD — stunned silence, scattered sobs, no cheering]
[Keys fade to silence like power being cut]
[END]
 
Jack Morgan - 11 – Heldrungen Lights_004

[INTRO]
[75–90 sec CROWD ERUPTS — then slowly settles into murmuring, soft claps in time, arena lights glowing]
[Narration – Frontman]
(spoken loud, spoken only, young smoky chest voice, gentle smile audible)
 
“Alright Börlin!…
after the darkest nights!… sometimes a dance floor is enough to remember how to breathe again!...
This one’s called!… Haeldrungen Lights!!”
[Verse 1]
Two weeks home, familiar streets
Old names echo in the heat
Neon humming, Friday night
Haeldrungen glowing soft and bright

I saw you dancing, slow and shy
Moving like you didn’t try
White blouse catching broken light
Something in me woke that night
[Chorus] (Crowd sings gently along)
Haeldrungen lights, spinning low
Turning time into afterglow
Every step felt small but true
Hope was learning how to move
[CROWD humming melody, soft claps, smiles audible]
[Verse 2]
Long wild hair in quiet curls
A nervous smile against the world
Mini skirt, summer skin
I forgot the pain I’d been in

Not a promise, not a plan
Just a song, a shaking hand
In that room I felt it start
Something warm around my heart
[Chorus]
Haeldrungen lights, slow and kind
Leaving heavy days behind
No big words, no need to prove
Just two souls learning how to move

[SPOKEN INTERLUDE – GUEST INTRO]

[Narration – SPOKEN ONLY, quick, mid-motion]
“Börlin!!... give me a big aplause for a very good Friend on Mandoline!... Chris "Mandolin" Davis! Ladies and Gentleman!!”
[Bridge]
[Band drops slightly — mandoline steps forward, dancing pattern]
We didn’t heal the past that night
We just let in a little light
Sometimes that’s enough to stay
Sometimes that’s how life finds a way
 
[Final Chorus] (wider harmonies, still gentle)
Haeldrungen lights, burning gold
New beginnings soft and bold
I didn’t know where it would lead
But hope was finally allowed to breathe
[CROWD singing full lines, warm, emotional, no shouting]
[Outro]
[Mandoline and acoustic guitar linger,
keys fade like closing eyes]
[60 sec CROWD — content murmurs, soft applause, gentle whistles]
[END]
 
Jack Morgan - 12 - Two Little Reasons_004

[INTRO]
[75–90 sec CROWD ROARING → slowly melts into calm murmuring,
soft claps fade, arena settles like a living room]
[Acoustic guitar arpeggios, warm keys pad]
[Narration – Frontman]
(spoken only, warm smoky voice, relaxed, smiling)
“Hey Crowd!... You know!… there are moments when life stops running!… and suddenly gives you reasons to stay!... This one’s called… Two Little Reasons!!”
 
[Verse 1]
We were young but we stood our ground
Found a rhythm, settled down
White dress barely holding on
Uniform under rising sun… yea!!

Hands were shaking, hearts were sure
Love felt simple, strong and pure
Before the first cry filled the room
I said “forever” way too soon… yea!!
[Chorus]
Two little reasons to stay alive
Two small voices, my greatest pride
Every doubt just fell away
When I heard them laugh, when I heard them say… woooh!!
[CROWD soft “oooh”, gentle clapping in time]
[Verse 2]
Families opened every door
Warm hellos, I wanted more
Sunday tables, easy days
Felt like home in so many ways… yea!!

First apartment, empty walls
Built it up from scraps and calls
Nothing fancy, nothing new
But every dream somehow came true… yea!!
[Chorus]
Two little reasons, day by day
Showed me how to love this way
I wasn’t lost, I wasn’t alone
I finally knew what “home” meant then… woooh!!

[SPOKEN INTERLUDE – GUEST INTRO]

[Narration – SPOKEN ONLY, quick, mid-motion]
„Ladies and Gentleman!... on Tschello the wunderful Sarah Bennett!... give it up for her!!...“

(Crowd erupts) 
„yeah, that’s right!“

[Bridge]
[Band softens — cello steps forward, long warm notes]
Old cars breaking, laughing through
Nothing ever felt untrue
Even when things fell apart
Life kept holding my heart… woooh!!
 
[Final Chorus] (slightly wider harmonies, still gentle)
Two little reasons, hand in mine
Turned my chaos into time
If the world ever pushed too hard
They were my ground, they were my start… woooh!!
[CROWD singing along, emotional but calm]
[Outro]
[Cello sustains, acoustic guitar slows]
[60 sec CROWD — warm applause, content murmurs, no cheering]
(Crowd erupts)
[END]
 
Jack Morgan - 13 - The Look That Changed Everythin

[90 sec CROWD ERUPTS → excited, alive, clapping rhythm]

[SPOKEN INTERLUDE – FRONTMAN]
(Frontman speaking loud, spoken only, no melody, no rhythm, young smoky chest male voice)
“Börlin!!... This song is called ‘The Look That Changed Everything’!!...  It’s about one second…
One look… And nothing after that was the same!”

[INTRO]

[Band fades in: warm electric guitar, slow pulse, keys shimmering]
 
 
[Verse 1]
I wasn’t searching, I was standing still
Another day, another rule to fill
Then your eyes cut through the room
Like lightning striking way too soon

No words spoken, no disguise
Just fire caught between our eyes
I felt my whole damn world collide
In one second I stopped trying to hide
[Chorus]
It was the look that changed everything
One silent crash, one forbidden thing
No touch, no sound, no warning sign
Just hearts crossing the wrong damn line
[CROWD singing melody, hands in the air]
[Verse 2]
I knew the cost, I knew the stakes
I knew the rules I’d have to break
But love don’t wait, love don’t ask
Love just pulls you off your path

Every day we felt it grow
Said nothing, but we both knew
Danger humming under skin
Like a song you’re already in
[Chorus]
It was the look that changed everything
Fear and desire intertwined
I should’ve walked, I should’ve run
But I stayed right there in your light
[CROWD louder, emotional, clapping in time]
[Verse 3]
Crowded rooms, we stood alone
Every silence overgrown
You found me when you could have turned
That’s when the lesson finally burned

When you needed arms to fall into
You chose mine — I chose you
In that hold the truth was clear
This was more than hope or fear

[Chorus]
It was the look that changed everything
No going back once you believe
I risked the life I thought I knew
For one real moment standing true

 
[SPOKEN INTERLUDE – GUEST INTRO]

[Narration – SPOKEN ONLY, quick, mid-motion, moderate reverb]
„Ladies and Gentleman!!... another one… my Bro, Christian the bluesman Braeter!... give it up for him!!“

(Crowd erupts) 
„yeah, Crowd!!“
[Bridge]
[Band drops — keys and bass pulse only]
[harmonica enters soft, breathy, restrained — no blues licks]
Maybe love is brave or blind
Maybe fools are hard to find
All I know is standing here
I never felt more real than this
[Final Chorus]
It was the look that changed everything
From that second, we were fate
One decision, one deep breath
I chose life — not quiet regret
[CROWD FULL VOICES, euphoric, singing along]
[Outro]
[harmonica holds long warm tone, guitar sustains]
[60 sec CROWD cheering, clapping, alive — joyful release]
[END]
 
Jack Morgan - NEW - 14 - No Turning Back_003

[Tempo: mid-high, steady driving rhythm. Dynamics: constant forward motion, no soft-legato. Verse: aggressive, tight, rhythmic — push syllables, minimal sustain. Chorus: full band, wide chords, layered band-member harmonies (no choir), maximum energy. Instrumentation: no orchestra, no harp, no pads, pure band sound. Crowd: active, hands-up, chants and claps build, respond to Frontman pauses and motifs. Final chorus: double-time feel, maximal stadium impact.]

[INTRO]
[60–90 sec CROWD ROARING, stomping, clapping, whistles]
[Drums kick in — driving four-on-the-floor]
[Bass rolls tight, locked to kick]
[Electric guitars slam rhythm chords left/right]
[Percussive piano accenting]

[Narration – Frontman]
(Frontman speaking loud, smoky chest voice, spoken only, no melody)
“Tonight… there’s no turning back.
Everything we risked!… everything we chose!…
It’s here!... And we ride it!!”

[CROWD CHEERS, building]

[Verse 1]

I crossed the line — no looking back
Every shadow I faced, I attacked
The walls around me tried to hold
But I broke free, I took control

Every step was mine to claim
Every spark ignited flame
No quiet path, no safety net
This is the fight I won’t forget

(Backing vocals — band members accent words: “CLAIM… FLAME… FORGET!”)

[Pre-Chorus]

No more waiting
No more doubt
Feel the fire
Scream it out

[Chorus – FULL BAND, BAND-HARMONIES]

We rise — no chains, no fear
Every voice you hear
Every hand in the air
This is ours — we declare

We rise — together now
Every step, every vow
No turning back
We own this moment now

[CROWD singing, clapping in sync, stomping]

[Verse 2]

Every risk, every choice
Led to this — lift your voice
Every heartbeat, every call
Built this moment, built it all

We stood close — against the night
Held our ground, we held the light
No whispers could break our stand
We found power hand in hand

(Backing vocals: “LIGHT… HAND… STAND!”)

[Pre-Chorus 2]

Push it harder
Shout it loud
Break the silence
Rock the crowd

[Chorus 2 – EXPLOSIVE]

We rise — no chains, no fear
Every voice you hear
Every hand in the air
This is ours — we declare

We rise — together now
Every step, every vow
No turning back
We own this moment now

[CROWD full stadium eruption, whistles, claps, chants]

[Bridge] (drums + piano + guitars drop slightly, still rhythmic)

We chose the fire
We took the fall
Every wall we faced
We smashed them all

[FINAL CHORUS – DOUBLE TIME, FULL BLAST]

We rise — we shout — we own the night
Every spark, every fight
Hands high, hearts ignite
This is bigger than life

We rise — no chains, no fear
Every voice you hear
Every hand in the air
This is ours — we declare

[CROWD roaring, waving, stomping, clapping — maximum arena energy]

[OUTRO]

[Band hits sustained open chord]
[Lead guitar melodic rise — 8 bars]
[Drums pounding, bass locked]
[CROWD ONLY — chanting: “WE RISE! WE RISE! WE RISE!”]

[Narration – Frontman, calm but euphoric]
“This is WHERE WE STANDING NOW... AND We will never go back!!”

[CROWD ERUPTS continues, slowly fading]
[END]
 
Jack Morgan - 14 - how it all began_018

[90 sec CROWD ROARING, stomping, clapping, chants building]
[Lights slowly dim, crowd settles, soft anticipation remains]

[SPOKEN INTERLUDE – FRONTMAN]
(Frontman speaking loud, spoken only, no melody, no rhythm, young smoky chest male voice)
“Alright Börlin!… before we say good night!… this one’s about now!… about why all of this even exists!... This song is called!… How It All Began!!”

[Intro]
[Banjo soft picking, acoustic guitar strums]
[Keys wide, analog pad, slow breathing movement]
[Drums brushed, heartbeat]
[CROWD gentle murmur, present but calm]
[Verse 1]
An ad on my phone, late night glow
Didn’t mean much, just scrolling slow
Curious fingers, nothing planned
Just tapping once, to understand
[Verse 2]
Typed a few words, hit play, leaned back
Didn’t expect more than digital crack
But something there refused to fade
A sound that stayed, a spark that stayed
[Chorus] (mehrstimmig, ruhig, nicht lauter)
(Crowd sing along)
Pseudonyms and songs
Passing time till time was gone
Little moments, nothing strong
Till they kept pulling me along
[CROWD soft sing-along, restrained, emotional]
[Verse 3]
Did it for fun, no reason why
Just loving music, letting it fly
No audience, no finish line
Just something mine, at the time
 
[Verse 4]
One more try, then one more still
No big dream, no greater will
It grew so quiet, then grew wide
Till I noticed it wouldn’t stay inside
[Chorus] (Band + Crowd, harmonies)
Pseudonyms and songs
Started small, carried on
Not a plan, not a throne
Just a feeling overgrown
[Bridge] (Crowd sing along)
(Banjo + Keys, intim)
Stories started stacking up
Different lives in paper cups
Some felt light, some felt wrong
Still I kept moving on
[Chorus] (Crowd sing along)
Pseudonyms and songs
Something simple turning long
Didn’t know what they’d become
Just knew keeping them felt wrong
[Final Chorus] (extended, mehrstimmig, getragen)
Pseudonyms and songs
Never meant to last this long
Started quiet, carried strong
Just a door I walked upon
[Spoken Outro – Frontman] (Good Night & Bandvorstellung)
 
[Band holds last warm chord, sustained]
[CROWD attentive, quiet]

[Narration]
(Frontman speaking loud, smoky voice, speaking only, no melody, moderate reverb:)
“Börlin!... Thank you!… really!… thank you for being here tonight!... and i say thanky you for Jake ‘Strings’ Carter -  on Banjo!… thank you Alex ‘Keys’ Turner, On keys for all those beautiful sounds!… 
thank you Chris mandoline Davis,... thank you Christian Braeter on harmonica,... i love you bro!… thank you for all of our guests!… You were all wonderful!!... 
Thank you for This band!… this crowd!… this family!…  
That’s P.O. and Friends!!...

Get home safe!…  
take care of each other!…  
and good night Börlin!!”

[Outro]
[Band fades gently]
[CROWD erupts warm applause, cheering, chanting "P-O! P-O!"]
[Lights go dark slowly]
[END]
 
Jack Morgan - 15 - WHAT WILL REMAIN_005

(Crowd erupts)

[Bridge]
[Band drops — Pedal Steel + Fiddle + Piano only]
[Orchestra breathes underneath, no rhythm]
[Narration]
(spoken, quiet, reflective)
"I won't be here forever!... [pause] But this music... and the memories of me might be!"

(Crowd erupts)

[Verse 3]
Maybe this fades in a year or two
Maybe it outlives me all
Maybe it’s nothing
Maybe it’s everything
I don’t decide at all… yea!!
I just followed something calling
Soft, but hard to ignore
If this is my contribution
I don’t need more… yea!!

(Crowd erupts)

[Final Chorus: Slow Build, Ethereal 5-part Harmony, Soaring Vocals]
What will remain
Is a simple song
Passed from now
To long after I’m gone
No regrets
No refrain
Just a name
And a flame
That’s what will remain… woooh!!

(Crowd erupts)
 
[Outro]
[Band slowly fades — instruments peeling away]
[Pedal Steel holds final note]
[Fiddle answers once]
[Piano only]
[Orchestra dissolves into air]
[CROWD continues singing last line alone]
“That’s what will remain…”
[60 sec CROWD — applause, chants, whistles, emotional but peaceful]
[Narration]
(Frontman, smiling, spoken)
“Good night Börlin!!…
Thank you for carrying this with me!!... wooohhh!!!”
(CROWD erupts) 
[band never returns]
[END]
 
Jack Morgan - NEW - FINAL TRACK-Bigger Than Me_107

[final master] [clean mix] [Live Performance; 20K wide arena ambience/reverb, consistent. Style: high energy 80s arena rock — drums driving, bass tight with kick, 2x rhythm guitars hard-panned, lead guitar melodic hooks, percussive piano accents only. IMPORTANT: All Frontman announcements and [Narration] MUST be spoken only (no singing, no melody). Spoken voice: young smoky chest male, confident, warm, natural breaths. [Perform script exactly in given order.] LIVE ELEMENTS: Crowd always organic present, active/reactive to band and Frontman, extended crowd roar intro & outro, chants, claps, whistles. End track with CROWD only. 20k wide Arena reverb; emotional arc: tension → build → explosive release.]

[Perform script exactly in given order, no skipping/rearranging.]

[Tempo 132 BPM – wide cinematic build, not louder than previous track; preserve headroom, no clipping, no distortion. Dynamics through arrangement, not volume.]
[Massive stereo width; sub controlled; kick tight; snare punch without harshness; guitars wide but not overpowering; avoid over-compression.]
[Final explosion achieved through harmonic layering and space, not gain increase.]
[Final section: band cuts completely; crowd continues singing unaccompanied for extended duration.]

[120-180 sec CROWD ERUPTS, stomping, clapping, chants building, emotional tension after previous track; low sub pulse slowly fades in like distant thunder]

[Narration – Frontman]
(Frontman speaking loud, smoky chest voice, spoken only, no melody)
„HEY BÖRLEEN!!... Tonight!…
this is not the end of a story!.
This is the moment it became something bigger!...
We thought we were writing songs!…
but something else was writing us!...
This one is called!…
Bigger Than Me!!“.

[Crowd erupts]

[Intro – Deep bass pulse, atmospheric pads expanding, slow tom build, distant lead guitar swells]

[Verse 1]
I lit a spark in the dark of the night
Thought it was mine, thought I held the light
But every step, every broken dream
Was building something unseen

[Drums enter fuller, guitars widen]

[Verse 2]
Every scar that I tried to hide
Every storm I survived inside
Every word that I screamed to the sky
Echoed back multiplied

[Pre-Chorus – tension rising]
It wasn’t just a voice in me
It was a wave across the sea

[Chorus – FULL EXPANSION, NOT LOUDER, JUST WIDER]
It’s bigger than me
Bigger than fire
Bigger than all of my wildest desire
It’s bigger than fear
Bigger than pain
Bigger than losing again and again
I was the spark
But we are the flame
It’s bigger than me

[Crowd already starting to sing along]

[Verse 3 – more confident tone]
I thought I carried this alone
Like a king without a throne
But every hand that reached for mine
Turned a heartbeat into a sign

[Pre-Chorus – drums driving harder]
It wasn’t fate, it wasn’t chance
It was millions rising at once

[Chorus – crowd louder now]
It’s bigger than me
Bigger than fire
Bigger than all of my wildest desire
It’s bigger than fear
Bigger than pain
Bigger than falling and rising again
I was the spark
But we are the flame
It’s bigger than me

[Bridge – SUPERNOVA BUILD]

[Drums drop to floor tom pulse, bass heartbeat, massive reverb swell]

[Narration – over build, spoken only:]
This was never just my voice…
It was yours.
It was always yours.

[Band explodes into final lift]

[FINAL CHORUS – MAX WIDTH, NO CLIPPING]

It’s bigger than me
Bigger than time
Bigger than rhythm and bigger than rhyme
It’s bigger than walls
Bigger than shame
Bigger than one single name
I was the spark
But we are the flame
It’s bigger than me

[Band cuts completely on last hit]

[ONLY CROWD – singing unaccompanied]

It’s bigger than me…
It’s bigger than me…
We are the flame…
We are the flame…

[CROWD continues singing, clapping rhythm, stadium echo swelling naturally]

[No band return]

“BIGGER THAN ME!”
(CROWD RESPONSE: BIGGER THAN ME!... BIGGER THAN ME!... BIGGER THAN ME!... BIGGER THAN ME!... BIGGER THAN ME!... BIGGER THAN ME!... BIGGER THAN ME!... BIGGER THAN ME!...) 

[Narration – Frontman]
(Frontman speaking loud, smoky chest voice, spoken only, no melody)
„BÖRLEEN!!... [PAUSE] I’M JACK MORGAN!!...GOOD NIGHT MY FRIENDS!!... AND… GOOD BYE!!“ 

“BIGGER THAN ME!!”

(CROWD RESPONSE: BIGGER THAN ME!... BIGGER THAN ME!... BIGGER THAN ME!... BIGGER THAN ME!... BIGGER THAN ME!... BIGGER THAN ME!... BIGGER THAN ME!... BIGGER THAN ME!...) 

[CROWD ERUPTS, stomping, clapping, cheering loud – long fade]
[120-180 sec CROWD ONLY]
[END]
